Title
Review for Horse Whisperer, The (1998)
Number of Reviews
26

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Touchstone Pictures
 Director:  Robert Redford
 Writer:  Eric Roth, Richard La Gravenese, novel by Nicholas
Evans
 Cast: Robert Redford, Kristin Scott Thomas, Sam Neill,
Dianne Wiest, Scarlett Johansson, Chris Cooper
  In his fluffy play "California Suite," Neil Simon's tense, chain-
smoking New York magazine writer visits her laid-back
ex-husband in southern California.  He, Bill Warren, cannot
understand why his ex continues to live in the fast-paced big
city while she, Hannah Warren, is appalled by what she
considers Bill's sloth.  Their mutual incomprehension
continues long after their marriage has dissolved.  The writer
does not take sides, but rather implies that while there's no
place like home, human beings must decide for themselves
where they prefer to be.  
   Robert Redford, on the other hand, does take a stand in
the conflict between city mouse and country mouse.  The
celebrated actor, who surpassed Paul Newman as the
country's most popular performer during the 1970s, maintains
a home in Manhattan but spends most of his time on his vast
properties in Utah.  His inclination is with the open spaces, or
so you'll have to believe if you accept "The Horse Whisperer"
as his adulation of the American west.  "The Horse
Whisperer" is filmed primarily in Montana, where the grass
grows tall and for some is greener on the other side. For
others, less jaded, this turf is the color of the finest emerald.
   The movie, which stars Robert Redford (who also directed
and co-produced the story from a best-selling novel by the
English writer Nicholas Evans), deals with a woman who edits
a slick, urban magazine, is vaguely dissatisfied with her
marriage to a good man, and who finds passion and meaning
among people who live in a different world.  Annie MacLean
(Kristin Scott Thomas) lives with her lawyer husband Robert
(Sam Neill) and their 14-year-old daughter Grace (Scarlett
Johansson).  On one snowy day in their upstate New York
country home, young Grace goes for a ride with her friend on
her beloved horse Pilgrim.  A freak accident throws her friend
from her horse where she is pulled along the ground.  Grace's
attempt to rescue her pal puts both in the path of a skidding
18-wheeler, killing her friend, injuring Pilgrim severely, and
causing Grace to lose part of her right leg.  Annie must now
cope with a teenager who is plunged into depression and a
badly damaged horse which has become so traumatized that
he turns feral.  The scenario brings to mind a news event
which broke just two weeks before the opening of the
picture...
            *          *                *
   NOLENSVILLE, Tenn. (AP May 5) -- An enraged horse
known for being unruly kicked a man to death. Sheriff's Sgt.
Robert Dillon said Tuesday that Billy Camron, believed to be
64, suffered severe injuries to his head, back and other parts
of his body and also had several bite marks. Dillon quoted
Camron's son as saying "it was just a mean
horse."  Deputies said they found the horse running "rampant
in the field" when they arrived Monday night.  The son
authorized the horse to be killed. 
                      *        *      *
   Pilgrim, however, had never been a mean horse and had,
in fact, tried to protect his rider from injury. Wounds inflicted
on him had turned him into a untamed beast, and Annie
rejects the advice of her vet (Cherry Jones) to "put him down"
seeking out a horse whisperer to restore his sanity.
   "The Horse Whisperer" encompasses two epic stories
during its ample, 164-minute span.  On one level, the picture
deals with the attempts of the title character, Tom Booker
(Robert Redford) to administer to a psychotic animal using a
technique unknown in the East and, in fact, even in his own
country.  As Booker puts it, he does not treat people with a
horse problem; he handles horses with people difficulties.  On
another plane, "The Horse Whisperer" is a romance involving
a slowly-growing relationship between a gentle rancher who
has not felt the pangs of love since he split up with his wife,
and an edgy, urban sophisticate who had not realized she
could respond in a vigorous way to a man.  The heady effect
of the plains spirit works its mysteries on young Grace as
well, who is lifted from her grand funk under the influence of
the sensitive horseman and the kindness of the extended
family of ranchers she has grown to respect.
   Redford seems to have chosen the subject to venerate a
way of life which is fading under the sway of the large
corporations: the spirit of the independent cowboys who
appear so remote from the attractions of the big city that they
might be living on Mars.  They are contrasted with what
passes for civilization by some clever, homespun dialogue. 
Told that a New York woman has come to spend time in
Montana, Frank Booker (Chris Cooper), Tom's brother,
suggests "Mixed salads...New York women like mixed
salads"--as he and his family dig into their robust dinner of
meat, mashed potatoes and thickly-buttered bread.  The
Bookers seem to amaze Grace and Annie momentarily when
they recite a quiet prayer just before digging into their spread,
though Frank's down-home wife Diane (Dianne Wiest), not
wholly satisfied by her life, wistfully suggests that she would
like to travel to Morocco.  Yet another jarring difference
between Montana and Manhattan emerges when Annie's cell
phone goes off, alarming the horse whom Tom is struggling to
tame.  A city dweller could scarcely imagine Tom's patience
when in one incident, as Pilgrim runs away from his corral,
the horse is captivated by the patient Tom who simply sits on
the grass and stares at the animal for hours as if to say "It's
your decision."
   You come away from the movie with a more visceral
understanding of why Kevin Bacon and Peter Fonda spend
most of their time on their Montana ranches and why Redford
would choose to live in Utah, spending only a fraction of his
year in New York.  Redford's is a west of Marlboro men who
don't smoke, rough-and tumble cowpokes who don't curse,
and squeaky-clean kids who say "ma'am" and "thank you"
and are genuinely involved in the chores on their ranch.  In
short it's about home, perhaps the most important word in the
English language.  In Redford's terms happiness belongs to
those who have found it.
   Scarlett Johansson provides us with a believable
performance of a fun-loving girl who, like her cherished
equine, turns bratty from a serious injury but who has become
wholly rehabilitated under the guidance of a considerate man.
Kristin Scott Thomas effectively bares her conflict between a
devotion to her dependable and loving husband and her
passion for a westerner who is firmly rooted to his place and
its history.  Robert Redford continues to amaze.  This sixty-
year old, impossibly handsome actor will probably continue
playing square-jawed, sky-eyed, lonely heroes well into his
eighties, and we don't wonder that after seeing the movie
"Indecent Proposal," a young man in the audience who said
to his date: "Would you sleep with him for a million dollars?"
gets the reply from the sweet young thing, "Sure: but you'll
have to give me some time to raise the money."  Rated
PG-13.  Running time: 164 minutes.  (C) Harvey Karten
1998

Author
Ben Hoffman
This can be characterized as a "nice" romantic, family film.    With
the exception of one frightening, traumatic scene the film makes for
pleasant watching.    Nothing, after the accident with the horse, is
designed to excite.   Beautiful photography of wide open spaces in
Montana makes the film easy going.
14-year-old Grace MacLean (Scarlett Johansson) is involved in an
accident while riding her horse.    Her friend is killed and she loses
part of her leg.  This leads to depression.    This trauma affects not
only Grace but the horse also has a change of behavior and will not
allow anyone to approach him    Grace's mother, Annie (Kristin Scott
Thomas), a dynamic always-on-the-go magazine editor is mobilized into
action to help her daughter.  This is not as easy as it would seem as
she and her husband Robert (Sam Neill) are not very close and daughter
Annie is not overly fond of her mother either.
When Annie hears there is a man who treats horses (A horse whisperer),
she decides she will leave her husband at home while she and Grace
travel to the Montana ranch where the man is said to work his wonders.
That man is Tom Booker (Robert Redford).     Before the horse is made
rid of his trauma, a romance springs up between Tom and Annie and
life on a ranch in Montana.
What I found difficult to swallow was Redford's portrayal of life in
Montana.   Every resident on the ranch appeared to be the happiest
person in the world.  No thought of drugs for the kids; how could
they, busy as they were branding cattle, mending fences, up early each
morning, big smile on their faces.   Diane Booker, (Dianne Wiest)
Tom's sister, despite all her cooking and other ranch chores, is
supremely happy, as is everyone at the table come chow time.  In the
evening, how about some square dancing and again all smiles.    All
those smiles made me a bit uneasy.     But if you are looking for a
pleasant film, this is it.

Author
James Kendrick
Director: Robert Redford || Screenplay: Richard LaGravenese and Eric Roth (based
on the novel by Nicholas Evans) || Stars: Robert Redford (Tom Booker), Kristin
Scott Thomas (Annie MacLean), Scarlett Johansson (Grace MacLean), Sam Neill
(Robert MacLean), Dianne Wiest (Diane Booker), Chris Cooper (Frank Booker),
Cherry Jones (Liz Hammond) || MPAA Rating: PG-13
Robert Redford is very good at playing characters who have incredible, God-given
gifts, but are able to act like ordinary people. In "The Natural" (1984), he
played the fallen angelic character of Roy Hobbs, the baseball player who was
destined to be "the best there ever was," but still acted like a humble farm
boy. In "Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid" (1969), he was the most dangerous
shot in the West, yet he came off like a nothing more than a boyishly
good-looking charmer. Even in "Indecent Proposal" (1993), where he played a man
who was so good at making money that he believed he could buy love, Redford was
still able to exude an aura of shy decency, especially when reciting a tale of
lost love.
In his latest film, "The Horse Whisperer," based on the best-selling novel by
Nicholas Evans, Redford again plays such a character. Redford also directed the
film although he swore up and down that he would never direct himself in a movie
- I suppose the character of Tom Booker, a man who has the amazing gift of
understanding and somehow communicating with horses, was just too good to pass
up. Despite his enormous and rare gift when it comes to training troubled horses
(a magazine article coins the phrase "horse whisperer" to describe his uncanny
talent), Booker sees himself as an everyday cattle rancher whose greatest fear
is growing old and no longer having a purpose in life.
Booker's talents are taxed into service by Annie MacLean (Kristin Scott Thomas),
a New York magazine editor whose daughter, Grace (Scarlett Johansson), was
recently in a horrible accident. The accident, which is filmed with
gut-wrenching horror, happens when Grace and her best friend are out riding
horses - an eighteen-wheeler kills Grace's friend, severely wounds and
traumatizes Grace's horse, Pilgrim, and causes Grace to lose part of her right
leg.
Annie believes that if Pilgrim can be healed, Grace will be healed as well,
which leads her to Booker. At first, she tries to get Booker to come to New York
to see the horse, but that doesn't work. Instead, she packs up Grace and
Pilgrim, leaves her husband, Robert (Sam Neill) behind, and heads for the
rolling hills of Montana where Booker runs a ranch with his brother, Frank
(Chris Cooper), and his sister-in-law, Diane (Dianne Wiest).
In many ways, the film is like a journey, both literally and symbolically. The
move out West has always been a great American tradition of renewal, and it's
hard not to see Annie and Grace's leaving Manhattan for Montana as a variation
on the classic theme of city vs. country. In "The Horse Whisperer," country is
clearly the victor. The city is characterized by claustrophobia and unhappiness,
and it is not until the characters arrive in the wide-open spaces of Montana
that Grace's anger at being physically and emotionally crippled begins to
dissipate, Annie's controlling nature begins to relax, and Pilgrim once again
learns to trust people.
Redford is just as in love with the grand Montana country in this film as he was
when he directed "A River Runs Through It" six years ago. In many ways, "The
Horse Whisperer" comes from the same poetic vein as "River," and the movie could
probably be a good fifteen minutes shorter if Redford had decided to spend less
camera-time on the grass and mountains. But then, that would ruin the magic.
Much of the film's photography is truly elegant, and it creates a palpable sense
of the sheer expansiveness of the land. To further emphasize this, Redford and
cinematographer Robert Richardson ("Natural Born Killers," "Platoon") cheated a
bit by shooting the beginning of the film - which takes place in New York - with
mostly cold, harsh bluish filters and a more squarish 1.85:1 aspect ratio; when
the action shifts to Montana, Richardson switches to soft-focus and natural
lighting, and the screen widens to a 2.35:1 aspect ratio.
In terms of the story itself, "The Horse Whisperer" gives us the same
romanticized view of adultery found in  David Lean's "A Brief Encounter" (1945)
and Clint Eastwood's 1995 adaptation of Robert James Waller's "The Bridges of
Madison County" (Richard LaGravenese, co-screenwriter here also adapted
"Bridges"). Although "The Horse Whisperer" has a strong romantic sensibility, I
still find something oddly troubling about this kind of story. It seems to me
that there should be some sympathy for the husband who's being left behind for
this brief, heart-sweeping affair, but there rarely is.
In "The Horse Whisperer," the thankless role of being the fuddy-duddy husband
falls to Sam Neill. He plays the character as a decent, hard-working man who is
a good husband and father; his only failure is that he loves his wife more than
she loves him. He is at risk of losing Annie to Booker not because he did
anything to drive her away, but simply because he happens to be a normal, fairly
uninspiring man.
There is one scene that is particularly telling of how the movie feels about
each character. It shows Booker and Robert going into a horse pen - Booker is
dressed like a classic cowboy with hat and all, while Robert looks somewhat
frumpy and out-of-place in a baseball cap. As they enter the pen, Booker
assuredly swings over the fence, while Robert hesitates, then opens the gate
and, in a goofy moment, forgets to close it behind him. It's a small scene, but
it clearly demonstrates the movie's thorough love of the Booker character for
his romantic roughness. After all, Booker represents everything good about the
city while Robert represents everything banal and unnatural about it.
The best scenes in "The Horse Whisperer" tend to involve not the building
romance between Booker and Annie, but rather the healing process of Grace and
her horse. Although Booker's horse-training methods are mythical and
unrealistic, the scenes with him and Pilgrim are strangely mesmerizing. These
are paralleled by the scenes between him and Grace, some of which are humorous,
and all of which are tender and true. At some point, I wished the movie would
drop the whole romance angle and focus on Grace more.
Nevertheless, Redford is obviously a romantic at heart, and he brings a light
touch to the erotic moments in the film. There are no dramatic sex scenes, but
there is a moving scene when he and Scott Thomas are slow-dancing, always moving
ever closer together, that is far more erotic than any scene of sweaty bodies
grinding together. Although the movie is longer than it should be and is
essentially a melodramatic tearjerker with an unsatisfying conclusion that
guarantees unhappiness for just about every character, there are enough moments
like that which make "The Horse Whisperer" worth the price of admission.


Author
Choo Eng Aun, Jack
A veteran returns to the helm, this time directing probably his best =
effort ever. Even though Robert Redford's time as a box-office star in =
his younger days are long gone (in the likes of Paul Newman and Steve =
Macqueen, in the eary 70's), his progress in the art of American Cinema =
never did cease.  Departing the indulgence with complexities in modern =
human lives (QUIZ SHOW), THE HORSE WHISPERER, wonderfully merges scarred =
lives in a beautiful tale of spiritual and emotional healing.
The film opens into a cold harsh winter sequence followed by a shot of =
Grace (Johansson) getting out of bed cheerfully to meet up with her best =
friend, obviously a routine but enjoyed by both. Grace looks forward to =
this meeting as it involves her other best friend, a horse named =
Pilgrim.  As both of them rode their horses through the snow, gossiping =
on boy topics, an unexpected accident occurs. The result; the death of =
her best friend and the loss of part of her right leg. Pilgrim survived =
the accident, heavily scarred and injured. Deeply shocked with the =
incident, Robert (Neill) and Annie (Thomas) struggled to come in terms =
with the trauma which had obviously devoid Grace of any form of hope in =
life. Pilgrim's entire persona too, has changed. Wild and violent, =
Pilgrim is no longer the same horse which embraced Grace's love and =
care.=20
Knowing how much the horse meant to Grace, Annie put her ladder-climbing =
career as a magazine editor on hold to drives both Grace and Pilgrim to =
the wild-west to a well known `Horse Whisperer', Tom Booker (Redford). =
The `Horse Whisperer', like Booker is known to have a special talent in =
being able to relate to the emotion of horses.  Annie hopes that by =
bringing healing Pilgrim, which to her, personifies an icon of hope to =
Grace, will ultimately heal her daughter as well. Little does she know, =
Booker will heal just a bit more than Pilgrim.
THE HORSE WHISPERER merges Pilgrim, Annie, Grace, Booker and Robert, =
each with their own personal in-bound demons and liberates them; =
providing a solution to all but one. While I will no tell you the =
ultimate outcome of it all, I will tell you that Booker's character is =
probably one of the greatest `hero' to embrace the screen. Redford and =
Thomas both give Oscar-nominate-able performances as Booker and Annie =
respectively. Two other performances worthy of mention comes from =
Johansson as the out-of-hope Grace and of course, who cannot fall in =
love with that Brown Wonder, Pilgrim.
Redford's ability as a director may as well earn him some sort of =
recognition here. Even though most will find the pace a tad too slow, =
THE HORSE WHISPERER never falters in term of story progression and =
character development. The wonderful cinematography and landscapes =
formed the formula for a remarkable visual experience but it too served =
in many ways to belittle its characters, making them seemingly powerless =
to their surroundings, hence increasing their vulnerability. Smart move, =
Mr. Redford.
THE HORSE WHISPERER is definitely one of the best films I've seen this =
year.

Author
Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
When Robert Redford won the Academy award for his direction of 'Ordinary
People' in 1980, I was surprised.  Not because of any lacking talent on
Redford's part, because his nurturing of each character in that film was
nothing short of brilliant.  What surprised me was that the director's
branch of the Academy would actually choose someone who primarily stood
out as an actor.  I suppose if you count 1948's 'Hamlet' in which
Laurence Olivier starred and also directed, it would not be something
entirely new because for that film, Olivier was nominated for directing
himself and the other actors and scored the Oscar prize for his
performance in that film and in the last several years, in 1990, 1992,
and 1995, we have seen actors such as Kevin Costner, Clint Eastwood and
Mel Gibson all come away with the Academy Award as Best Director for
directing themselves in their films.  Redford has now directed himself.
Surprisingly, in all of Redford's other films, 'Ordinary People', 'The
Milagro Beanfield War', and 'Quiz Show', Redford has been absent in
front of the camera.
In 'The Horse Whisperer', Redford stars as an expert horseman who runs a
ranch in Montana and is contacted by a New York City magazine editor
(Kristin Scott Thomas) for some help in dealing with an injured horse
and the trauma of her thirteen year old daughter (Scarlett Johansson)
who has lost half of her right leg in a horrible riding accident.
Redford senses by the telephone conversation he's having with Thomas
that there isn't much he can do to help her and he hangs up on her
rather abruptly but not rudely and she is determined to seek help for
her daughter.  She travels from NYC to Montana with her daughter (who
rides in the back seat) and the horse is transported in a hitched
trailer.  The daughter is not only bitter about her situation but by the
loss of her friend's life in the accident and by her naive certainty
that her mother is just doing this for her own selfish benefit and
believes her mother cares little for her injuries or for the horse.
Their arrival in Montana is somewhat awkward as Redford is not expecting
them and Thomas doesn't know what to expect from him.  Upon seeing the
horse for the first time, Redford's keen instinct and feel for the
animal give the film its emotional core as the feelings for this grand
beast are made to seem, and, frankly, they are as important as the
feelings we have for the human characters.  Redford uses effective shots
of the horse's one eye on the screen from time to time.  Sometimes the
left, sometimes the right and sometimes both of them and along with
little glimpses of the horse's ears perking up at the right moment and
its galloping in both rehabilitation and in its own maverick tendencies,
the film remains solid.
A mild romance develops between Redford and Thomas but rather than turn
the film into a soap opera by opening the audience's chest and massaging
our hearts openly with his bare hands, Redford uses a more hypnotic and
imaginative style of presentation that stays within the traditions of
pure generational film making.  'The Horse Whisperer' is easily a film
that could have been made anytime in the last 70 years of movie making
and that is its strongest quality.  It's for all ages.  A grandparent
will enjoy it as much as their grandson or granddaughter.  The factory
worker will like it as much as a doctor or lawyer.  Its appeal is as
broad as its story.
Director of photography Robert Richardson (Oscar winner for 1991's
'JFK'), deserves high praise for his towering images.  Richardson is a
patient cameraman, waiting for the right clouds to pass, the right
illumination of light, the right light to bend and bounce and he
captures much of the landscape from high aerial shots which are perfect
in matching the film's visual style to its highly charged dramatic
story.  The last shot is a classic.  You'll remember it long after you
leave the theatre.  You can't say that about too many movies.  The film
is also crisply edited for a real thrust in dealing with the flavour of
a western story.
Screenwriters Eric Roth ('Forrest Gump') and Richard LaGravenese ('The
Fisher King') have adapted the film from the novel by Nicholas Evans and
while I have not read the novel, I understand Redford has changed its
ending.  Less than 5% per cent of the population read books and less
than 20% read newspapers so if changing the ending of a book works for
the creation of a motion picture, I see nothing wrong with it.
Redford directs himself very well in this film and gets a performance
from Kristin Scott Thomas that has real edge and she really moved me.
I, personally, have found her to be a very frigid actress in other
films.  I had no sympathy for her self destructive character in 'The
English Patient' but the real magic in this film is from young Scarlett
Johansson.  Her transformation in personality from a bitter, traumatized
accident victim to a spirited youth, as she was at the beginning of the
film, before the accident, is truly great screen acting which I hope
brings her an Oscar nomination.
I remember predicting in May of 1995 that 'Braveheart' would make it all
the way to the Academy Awards and now in May of 1998, I am predicting
the same for 'The Horse Whisperer'.  Will it win Best Picture?  It's too
early to tell but if it isn't on the list of the final five, that will
be a shame.  Its running time of 169 minutes makes it a frontier epic
which strikes at the heart of the human condition and it leaves no stone
unturned and not a single frame of film is mishandled.  This is
Redford's best film.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
David N. Butterworth
        It seemed wholly appropriate that at a weekend screening of "The
Horse Whisperer," the start of the film was delayed some twenty minutes due
to "projection difficulties."
        Robert Redford's film version of Nicholas Evans' best-selling novel
was supposed to have been in theaters last December, going head-to-head
with "Titanic," but is only now making its much anticipated debut.  This
(strategic?) delay has allowed "The Horse Whisperer" to compete, sans
fanfare, against some smaller, unassuming movies during a relatively slower
time at the box office.
        No matter.  Redford's film stands head and shoulders above James
Cameron's ocean-going tragedy, especially in the writing and acting
departments.  Whatever the reasons for its postponement, "The Horse
Whisperer" supports the old adage "better late than never."
        Redford has taken Evans' book and given it the big screen
treatment.  While parts of "The Horse Whisperer" are epic in scope and
vision, especially the aerial "travelogue" that maps out this great country
of ours, its real strength lies in the subtleties it uses to paint the
fragile alliance between man and beast.
        When her daughter, Grace, is involved in a terrible riding
accident, hard-driven fashion editor Annie MacLean (Kristin Scott Thomas)
devotes herself to rehabilitating both Grace and Grace's beloved horse,
Pilgrim.  Refusing to have the hideously disfigured animal put down, Annie
researches every possible source of information about equine cures before
discovering an article about a faith-healing cowboy of sorts called Tom
Booker (Redford), who has a way with horses and, perhaps, with people too.
        Undeterred by Tom's initial reluctance to get involved, Annie
drives Grace and a sedated Pilgrim across country to meet him, and finally
persuades Tom to work with the uncontrollable animal.
        Redford's film unfolds slowly and lovingly, echoing the patience
required in healing both physical and psychological wounds.  The film's a
little long and, even if you haven't read the book, it's pretty obvious
where it's heading--but these are minor complaints.  Redford and Thomas are
strong and convincing as the couple drawn by a mutual affection for the
great outdoors and each other, but it's Scarlett Johansson as Grace who
shines in a more difficult role.  Dianne Wiest, Chris Cooper ("Lone Star"),
and Sam Neill--better than I've seen him before--round out the respectable
supporting cast.
        And the director's respect for horses is clearly in evidence.  One
word of warning, however: while brilliantly shot, the accident scene,
involving an out-of-control truck, is extremely disturbing.
        Redford's canvas is huge and exquisite.  He doesn't hesitate to
incorporate vast, sprawling vistas of the American northwest: spectacular,
snow-capped mountain ranges, azure skies, and shimmering fields of
wheat--all are resplendent in cinematographer Robert Richardson's
viewfinder.
        Veteran English composer John Barry was originally signed to score
the film but left the project which is a pity, since "The Horse Whisperer"
is "Dances with Wolves" by way of "Out of Africa" (Oscar winners both for
Barry).  Fortunately, Barry's replacement, Thomas Newman, contributes a
fine score that nicely balances the majesty of Montana with the delicate,
human conditions--sonorous, string-laden passages that swell with pride
playing counterpoint to more poetic, introspective movements ripe with
nuance.
        "The Horse Whisperer" is that rare kind of movie: it looks good, it
feels good, and by golly it does you good.  The wait, it turns out, was
well worth it.

Author
Steve Rhodes
     Kneeling stoically in a field of tall grass, Robert Redford, as
horse whisperer Tom Booker, locks eyes with Pilgrim, a wild horse with
a troubled past, who is a hundred yards away.  With Zen-like composure,
Tom doesn't flinch as the hours drag on and the day begins to fade.  As
the wide Montana skies turn a golden orange, he finally wins this
latest battle of wills with the horse.  With sagacity and
determination, Tom has much to teach the equine and human characters in
this delicate drama.
     Robert Redford, whose only Oscar was for his direction of the
brilliant and devastating ORDINARY PEOPLE from 1980, accepts the
challenge of directing himself in the starring role in THE HORSE
WHISPERER.  Quite unlike what passes for drama today, THE HORSE
WHISPERER contains deeply felt and complex emotions but without
shouting or profanity.  Based on Nicholas Evans's best seller, the
script by Richard LaGravenese (A LITTLE PRINCESS) and Eric Roth
(FORREST GUMP) is in no hurry to tell the story, which unfolds as
naturally as a mountain wildflower.  Coming in at just under three
hours - Redford's first cut was close to four, the movie so mesmerizes
you that your only complaint is likely to be that you wish it were
longer.
     The film starts with a horrible accident between two young teenage
girls on horseback and a large tractor-trailer truck.  The movie
centers around the two survivors; a girl named Grace MacLean, played
with grace by Scarlett Johansson, and Pilgrim, played by six different
and incredibly talented horses.  Grace loses part of her leg, and
Pilgrim is so badly injured that the vet recommends "putting him down."
     Grace is the daughter of hard-driving, Manhattan magazine
publisher Annie and ever-agreeable lawyer Robert.  Kristin Scott
Thomas, nominated for an Academy Award for her romantic role in THE
ENGLISH PATIENT, is the slowly metamorphosing Annie.  Starting out as
cold as ice, she transforms into quite a different character.  As
Robert, character actor Sam Neill imbues the role with just the right
mixture of bland but genuine allegiance to his family.
     After Kristen Scott Thomas reads in eloquent voice-over the
definition of a horse whisperer, Annie calls up Tom in Montana to ask
him to help Pilgrim.  "Truth is, I help horses with people problems,"
Tom explains to her.  He turns Annie down, which in her best business
demeanor she refuses to accept.  "Am I being too polite here?" he asks.
"Does 'no' in Montana mean 'yes' where you are?"
     Soon Annie and a reluctant Grace are off with Pilgrim in tow,
crossing the country in hopes of getting Tom to change his mind.  This
trip gives Oscar winning cinematographer Robert Richardson (JFK) one of
many opportunities to dazzle us with his exquisite work.  As they drive
through farmland in the country's heartland, Richardson films them from
on high.  Their car cuts through the patchwork quilt of fields as the
film's score hits one majestic note after another, all overlaid with
the chatter of their car radio picking up static-filled, local
stations.  Richardson is even better with the close-ups than the
sweeping vistas.  The intricate raindrops on the windshield are one of
the many little treats he serves up for us.
     "Do they have any signs around here?" Annie asks Grace.  "What
would they say?" Grace asks looking around at the lovely but remote
terrain.  "10 miles to big rock.  20 miles to bigger rock."
     Although the script does have these occasional bits of humor, it
is in the wisdom, in the character development and - yes, Redford fans
- in the romance where it is most compelling.  With his ruggedly
handsome face that speaks of many never-to-be-told mysteries, Redford
is an actor for every generation.  His little smile is guaranteed to
win every heart in the audience in an instant.
     The best of the story's simple, wisdom-filled scenes has Annie and
Tom reflecting on parts of their lives.  Annie says she envies Tom's
elderly mother, who is at an age in which she has no more decisions to
make and in which she can savor the good decisions in her life as well
as the bad ones.  During this soul bearing Annie asks Tom how he knew
that his long-since divorced wife was not right for him.  "Knowing it
is the easy part," he tells her.  "Saying it out loud is the hard
part."
     I fell head over heels in love with this powerful but subtle
movie.  And audiences may again become infatuated with the 61-year-old
Redford, proving that age makes no difference when it comes to love.
     THE HORSE WHISPERER runs 2:44.  It is rated PG-13 for one
disturbing accident scene and would be fine for kids around 10 and up.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
The Horse Whisperer (1998)
Robert Redford, Kristin Scott Thomas, Scarlett Johansson, Sam Neill, 
Dianne Wiest, Chris Cooper, Cherry Jones, Ty Hillman. Directed by Robert 
Redford. 168 minutes.
PG-13, 4 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com/film/
Archive reviews at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
During one of "The Horse Whisperer's" most lyrical scenes, a horse panics 
and runs away. Tom Booker, assigned the task of calming the troubled 
animal, does not chase him. Instead, he walks into the field and waits. 
Minutes turn to hours as Tom continues to wait for the animal in silence. 
Finally, after waiting all day, Tom's patience is rewarded as the horse 
quiets and returns to him on its own accord. "The Horse Whisperer" is 
filled with understated moments like that. Poetic, dignified and deeply 
humane, the film is a rarity, a rich character-driven tale with brains, 
heart and integrity.
Based on Nicholas Evans' best-selling novel, the story focuses on 14-year-
old Grace MacLean, emotionally and physically crippled following a tragic 
riding accident. Grace isn't the only traumatized party. Her beloved 
horse Pilgrim turns wild, and several handlers tell the family that the 
horribly wounded creature will never recover and should be "put down." 
But Grace's mother Annie, sensing that her daughter's recovery is somehow 
linked to the horse, refuses and seeks another solution. After reading an 
article about horse whisperers, people with an almost mystical ability 
for reaching troubled horses, she seeks out the legendary Tom Booker and 
asks for help. Ignoring his brusque refusal, Annie takes a leave of 
absence from her job as a high-powered New York magazine editor, packs up 
both horse and daughter and heads for Tom's Montana ranch. 
Much like another print sensation, "The Bridges of Madison County," "The 
Horse Whisperer" was derided by some as mawkish and melodramatic. And, 
just as Clint Eastwood did with James Waller's book, Robert Redford has 
taken Evans' words and transformed them into a beautifully crafted film 
that draws a strong emotional reaction honestly, with well-drawn 
characters and intelligent dialogue. 
"The Horse Whisperer" is a long movie, just under three hours, but the 
length is justifiable. As the story moves from Manhattan to Montana, 
Redford changes the rhythm, placing the audience in a setting where 
things move with a more deliberate, thoughtful pace. Although the Montana 
setting is idyllic, Redford doesn't take cheap shots at those who live in 
the city. Instead, he presents two approaches to navigating through life, 
contrasting those who push for quick answers with those who take the time 
to observe, listen and thing things through.
That's the secret behind a horse whisperer's "mystical" ability. Tom 
Booker, as played by director Redford, is a man whose magic comes from 
paying attention. He learns about Pilgrim by watching the horse and the 
people who love it. Along the way, he also learns what Grace needs, 
giving her space when she demands it and structure when she requires it. 
And, much to his surprise, he learns what Annie needs as well.
Stories about young people trying to recover from traumatic incidents are 
nothing new, of course. "Ordinary People," the first film Redford 
directed, dealt with a tortured youth and the strained relationship 
between him and his mother. Redford handles this sort of thing well 
because he doesn't take the easy route. There are no villains in "The 
Horse Whisperer." People make mistakes, but they learn from them. People 
are faced with difficult choices and they make reasoned decisions. 
Redford creates the kind of world that could be, if only all of us would 
try harder, care more and take responsibility for our own actions and the 
effect those actions might have on others. You don't see that in movies 
very often anymore.
The acting in"The Horse Whisperer" is as good as its script. The always 
dependable Dianne Wiest and Chris Cooper are strong as Tom's brother and 
sister-in-law, and Sam Neill is sturdy as Grace's father, shining in a 
beautifully written speech towards the end of the film. Scarlett 
Johansson strikes just the right notes as Grace, capturing the pain the 
young woman suffers without ever overplaying the angst. As Annie, "The 
English Patient's" Kristin Scott Thomas takes risks, displaying the 
abrasive, brittle side of her character along with her many sympathetic 
qualities. 
Redford is excellent as Tom Booker. He could easily have made the 
character a noble icon, or overplayed the down-home, "Aw shucks" cowboy 
business. Instead, Redford creates an erudite, well-spoken man who has 
loved, lost and learned from the experience. It's an strong, nuanced, 
honest performance. About the only area where Redford cheats a little is 
in the lighting. Throughout the film, the sun mostly shines on Redford 
from the back or side, minimizing the wrinkles on the aging actor's face. 
Good for him! In a film as benign and forgiving as "The Horse Whisperer," 
it's only fair to forgive Redford for showing a little bit of vanity. He 
deserves it. 

Author
James Berardinelli
Cast: Robert Redford, Kristin Scott Thomas, Sam Neill, 
      Scarlett Johansson, Dianne Wiest, Chris Cooper, Ty Hillman, 
      Catherine Bosworth
Director: Robert Redford
Producers: Robert Redford, Patrick Markey
Screenplay: Richard LaGravenese, Eric Roth based on the novel by 
      Nicholas Evans
Cinematography: Robert Richardson
Music: Thomas Newman
U.S. Distributor: Touchstone Pictures
     Low, gray clouds scud across the sky while the grass of a 
seemingly-endless plain ripples in response to the prompting of a spring 
breeze.  Thunder rumbles in the distance.  On another day, a bright sun 
gazes down on those same fields while cattle roam from horizon to 
horizon.  The silhouette of a lone cowboy on horseback stands out 
against an evening skyline.  Above these vistas, the Rocky Mountains 
tower like implacable guardians, seeing all.  These are only some of the 
images from THE HORSE WHISPERER, a film as rich in its visual 
presentation as it is in its emotional resonance.
     As directed by veteran actor/film maker Robert Redford, THE HORSE 
WHISPERER is a powerful and moving tale of love and loss that eschews 
melodramatic manipulation in its pursuit of a simple, honest tale.  I 
have not read the best-selling novel by Nicholas Evans upon which the 
movie is based, but if it's as good as (or better than) the motion 
picture adaptation, it's easy to understand its appeal.  As a director, 
Redford has made some impressive films; this is among his best. 
     THE HORSE WHISPERER opens peacefully enough, with two teenage girls 
leaving their houses in the early morning hours for a horseback ride.  
The sunrise is brilliant, and, as snow begins to fall later in the day, 
the fields and forest are turned into a winter wonderland of blues and 
silvers.  Everything is picture perfect until tragedy strikes, brutally 
and without warning.  One of the girls' mounts loses his footing on the 
icy ground and, suddenly, the two friends are in the path of a skidding 
18-wheeler.  One girl and her horse die.  The other pair, Grace MacLean 
(Scarlett Johansson), and her beloved steed, Pilgrim, are badly injured.  
Grace loses the lower half of one leg.  Pilgrim is driven mad, and 
everyone advises that he be put to sleep.
     Grace's parents, Annie and Robert MacLean (Kristin Scott Thomas and 
Sam Neill), are ill-prepared to help their daughter cope with her 
physical disability and the mental scars of having seen her best friend 
run down by an out-of-control truck.  Annie decides that Grace's 
recovery will be aided if she can find a way to heal Pilgrim (the film's 
only dubious contrivance).  So, with her daughter and the horse in tow, 
Annie heads out to Montana, where a legendary "horse whisperer," Tom 
Booker (Robert Redford), lives and works on a ranch.  After seeing 
Pilgrim, Tom agrees to try to help the horse, and so begins a long 
period of restoration for four souls:  Pilgrim, Grace, Annie, and Tom.
     Those of a romantic nature may focus on the understated 
relationship between Annie and Tom, but that's just one aspect of a 
story of great depth.  THE HORSE WHISPERER is about the healing power of 
love.  Like Atom Egoyan's masterpiece, THE SWEET HEREAFTER, this film 
eloquently illustrates how difficult it is to recover from a life-
altering trauma, and how the ripples from such an event can affect those 
who were not directly involved.  
     Everyone in this film has their own demons to wrestle with.  Grace, 
who retreats into a sullen cocoon after the accident, is raw on the 
inside, but won't let it out.  She resents her mother's emotional 
distance and is frightened that the loss of her leg makes her useless 
and will doom her to a life alone.  ("Nobody will want me like this!")  
Annie, who is used to being in charge, doesn't know how to cope with the 
situation, and, when she takes the time to examine her life, she 
recognizes how the pressures of her career have leeched away her 
humanity.  Meanwhile, Tom, who is basically at peace with himself, 
begins to re-discover what it means to love, something he had lost when 
his wife left him.
     There is an Oscar-caliber performance in THE HORSE WHISPERER, but 
it isn't given by Redford, Scott-Thomas, or Neill.  Instead, it's the 
work of young Scarlett Johansson, who has already proven her talent with 
a remarkable debut in MANNY & LO.  As Grace, Johansson makes a case to 
be placed alongside Christina Ricci and Natalie Portman as one of the 
best actresses of her generation.  She does everything necessary to make 
Grace a living and vital character, and, like all good performers, much 
of her acting comes through subtle expression changes and body language.  
Johansson is so effective, in fact, that Grace's story becomes THE HORSE 
WHISPERER's emotional core, not just a plot device whereby Tom and Annie 
find themselves and one another.
     Redford's Tom is exactly the kind of character we expect from 
Redford:  a solid, kind, rugged man who is long on patience and rarely 
displays much emotion.  It could be argued that the former matinee idol 
is a little too old for this sort of role, but, even with his features 
growing wrinkled and weathered, the camera still flatters him.  Kristin 
Scott Thomas makes a worthy opposite:  she's attractive (but not so 
stunning that she steals the spotlight away from her older co-star), 
mature, and a good actress.  Solid support is provided by the always-
reliable Sam Neill, Chris Cooper (LONE STAR), and Dianne Wiest.  
     Emotionally, THE HORSE WHISPERER finds the perfect pitch.  There's 
no overacting and no overt audience manipulation; we feel with and for 
the characters, but there's never a sense that we're being tricked into 
providing a particular, desired response.  The film is neither 
relentlessly downbeat nor needlessly cheerful; it's about healing, but 
there is a strong, bittersweet current running through the love story 
subplot.
     As a director, Redford has never shown greater mastery of his 
material.  His presentation of Montana, with all of its glorious open 
spaces, is enough to make anyone in the theater think about heading 
west.  He also manages to make the day-to-day activities of running a 
ranch and working with horses seem interesting.  At the outset, I feared 
that I might be bored by THE HORSE WHISPERER, but, despite the running 
length (which creeps close to TITANIC territory with no shipwreck in 
sight), I found myself thoroughly absorbed.  The presentation of the 
truck accident is memorable for the way in which it is staged -- it's 
loud, horrifying, and chaotic.  The editing and cinematography are 
perfect, and fashion an unforgettable cinematic moment.
     Speaking of cinematography, it's necessary to say a few words about 
Richard Richardson's work, which is effective throughout.  As good as 
Richardson is in photographing the sky and land, and presenting 
instances in silhouette, he is no less accomplished in capturing the 
nuances of small moments -- a quick smile here, a studied glance there.  
Most capable cinematographers would be hard-pressed not to make a shot 
of the Rocky Mountains look impressive; Richardson does as much with his 
photography of the characters as he does with the setting.
     Redford, along with screenwriters Richard LaGravenese and Eric 
Roth, has made a significant change to the ending of the story as 
presented in the novel.  But, while die-hard fans of Evans' book may be 
disappointed by the alteration, which significantly dampens the level of 
melodrama, it fits perfectly with the delicately-balanced tale and 
characters Redford has brought to the screen.  Every summer, it seems 
that there is at least one literate, intelligent alternative to the 
mindless blaze of action films.  For the early season of 1998, it's THE 
HORSE WHISPERER.  GODZILLA may be bigger, but for those who care about 
plot and character, and who want to experience a genuine emotional 
response, this is the real giant.
Now with more than 1400 reviews...
The ReelViews web site: http://movie-reviews.colossus.net/
"My belief is that no movie, nothing in life, leaves people neutral. You
either leave them up or you leave them down."

Author
Michael Redman
As trite as it sounds, life is full of potentials. Every day we wake up,
there are new alternatives. Every time we turn around, there are new options.
With so many possibilities, often it's difficult to make choices. And after
we've made them, we wonder what would have happened if we had taken the other
path. The what-ifs can be infuriating. What would have happened if I had left
this person to be with that one? Quit this job and taken the other?
One absolute truth is that we never know those answers. We can't live both
lives. As difficult as it may be, we have to make the choice and go on.
Annie MacLean (Kristen Scott Thomas) must make one of those painful
decisions. She either leaves everything behind for a new love and a new life
or she abandons her would-be lover to return to a relationship she has devoted
her life to. Either way she loses. Either way she wins.
In a horrendous accident, Annie's daughter Grace (Scarlett Johansson) and her
horse Pilgrim slide in the snow into the path of an 18-wheeler. Grace looses
half of her leg. Her best friend is killed. Pilgrim is badly hurt and driven
mad. The vet wants to put the horse down, but Annie refuses permission.
The 14-year old girl sinks into depression. Her mother and father, Robert
(Sam Neill), are desperate to do something to pull her out of it. When Annie
happens upon an article about a mysterious "horse whisperer" who can work
wonders with equine problems, she packs up Pilgrim and the reluctant Grace and
heads out in their Range Rover for a New York to Montana trek.
After they arrive at his ranch, cowboy shaman Tom Booker (Robert Redford)
reluctantly agrees to look at the horse. He has already told her "no" on the
phone ("Does 'no' in Montana mean 'yes' where you are?"), but Pilgrim is there
and Booker has a heart of gold.
All four of the major characters (Annie, Grace, Tom and Pilgrim) are damaged
goods. Annie is so obsessed with her career that she's lost her life. Grace
believes that she can't go on. Pilgrim is crazed. Booker's beloved wife left
him years before and he's never been able to fall in love again.
The interaction between them brings each to a better way of being. Booker
works with the horse and at the same time Grace starts to come out of her
black mood. Annie, the hard New York magazine editor, also begins to soften to
the simple life and to the quiet complex man. 
She and Tom begin to explore their mutual attraction. They slow dance
together and the desire is obvious. Director Redford gets more out of a hand
on a back and a leg touching a thigh than most other directors can accomplish
with two sweaty naked people. When Robert shows up to visit, Annie is faced
with the fateful choice.
        Redford is obviously in love with the big sky country. It's not difficult to
imagine why he spends most of his time on his ranch in Utah rather than his
home in New York. Judging from the film, you know where his heart is and he
wants you to feel the same.
This is a beautiful film. The affectionate look at the countryside is
breathtaking and the story unfolds in an unhurried natural manner. When Booker
and Pilgrim stare into each others' eyes in a field of tall grass for what
seems to be hours, it's real and makes sense. He and Annie take a sunset ride
to a gorgeous vista and somehow it isn't corny.
Even with the complex issues that the film addresses and the longing gazes
between man and woman and man and horse, the movie's plot is a bit simplistic.
There is little doubt as to the outcome of the story. After the plot is laid
out, you know what's going to happen to Grace and Pilgrim. Even Annie and
Tom's relationship is fairly predictable, as is the ending. The strength of
the film is that, although you know what is going to happen, it happens with style.
All of the actors are believable and some fine performances are on the
screen. Even the small parts (Chris Cooper and Dianne Wiest as Tom's brother
and sister-in-law) are tasty.
Redford is never disappointing as an actor, but there's an oddness to his
portrayals. He's a little too clean. His characters are likable and engrossing
but they're somewhat sterile. Tom Booker is the kind of guy you'd love to have
as a friend, but you'd always suspect that somewhere there's a hidden dark
side. He's just too darned nice.
The ranch life is also fairly antiseptic. It all looks beautiful and calm.
There's a place for everything and everything is in its place. In my
experience, where there are horses, there are piles of...well, you know.
Country life has its attractions, but it's not nearly as neat and tidy as
Redford would have us believe.
This is a fairy tale for adults so it doesn't matter much that Tom and his
ranch aren't realistic. We aren't meant to question the lack of faults. We are
supposed to feel the message.
Although the film is overly long at nearly three hours, the length and
slowness imparts the sensuousness of natural surroundings. As I was watching,
I was reminded that I hadn't been out in the country for weeks.
It's necessary to get away from our everyday lives occasionally and touch the
dirt. Living in town and working every day causes us to lose the big picture.
The experience of watching the movie is a virtual visit, almost like being
there. It's not the same, but it does remind us that there's something else
besides jobs and television.
(Michael Redman has written this column for 23 years, but now he's thinking
about camping.)
[This appeared in the 5/21/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Author
Boyd Petrie
THE HORSE WHISPERER (1998)
Rated PG-13 for a disturbing accident scene and some brief profanity.
----------  Out of 4 stars: **** (4 Stars)
Starring: Robert Redford, Kristen Scott Thomas, Scarlett Johansson, Sam Neil,
Dianne Wiest, and Chris Cooper.
One of the many challenges of adapting a best-selling novel is making
it appealing to the fans of the book.  Unfortunately, Robert Redford
may not have done that, as his film, THE HORSE WHISPERER, alters the
ending drastically (from what I have heard).  I haven't read the
Nicholas Evans' novel, but I can't imagine it being better than this
filmed version.  Robert Redford is one of the few underrated directors
whose work is usually acknowledged as good, but not great.  I like to
think of Redford as one of the greatest directors working today.
THE HORSE WHISPERER proves just that.  His smooth direction is key to
the film's tone and emotions, and without bending into the
melodramatic, he almost forces tears out of our eyes.  Redford has
proven a great director before, with such films as his directing
debut, ORDINARY PEOPLE (oh yeah, he snagged an Oscar for that one), A
RRIVER RUNS THROUGH IT, and the Oscar-nominated QUIZ SHOW (my personal
favorite of all of his films).  And now, he makes an incredibly moving
motion picture that beckons back to the good old days of making motion
pictures for the heartfelt emotions (TITANIC anyone?).  Of course,
there are bound to be those cynics who claim that the film revolves
around a ludicrous plot, and yes, if you think about it, the plot is
slightly corny.  But that's not what the film is about.  It's about
emotions.
THE HORSE WHISPERER begins with a stunning montage sequence of a horse
moving gracefully across sandy hills.  The main plot is set in motion
with a horrific and terrifying scene.  Two girls, Judith (Catherine
Bosworth) and Grace (Scarlett Johansson), set out to take a peaceful
ride through the snowy country.  Deciding to take a shortcut up a
steep embankment, the two girls find themselves in trouble when
Judith's horse can't make it up and slides down the hill, taking Grace
and her horse, Pilgrim, with her.  A huge 18-wheeler approaches the
two girls as their horses try to escape.  The attempts fail, and the
truck slides over Judith and her horse, while Pilgrim throws Grace
off, injuring himself in the process.  The PG-13 rating is mostly
warranted because of this scene, which is more graphically implied
than witnessed (in other words, we think we see more than we do).
Grace is injured badly, and her leg is amputated, while Pilgrim hides
under a bridge, grotesquely disfigured.  Grace's parents, Annie and
Robert MacLean (Kristen Scott Thomas and Sam Neill), race to the
hospital, where they are faced with a decision: put the horse to
sleep, or let him suffer in pain.  Under so much pressure, Annie
recommends that they keep the horse alive.  A while later, Annie
visits Pilgrim, who seems to peer into her soul.  Annie decides that
she can't kill the horse, but help it heal, as it may aid in healing
her daughter.  Grace, meanwhile, is struggling through ridicule from
her peers and depression.  Assisted with a prosthetic limb and
crutches, she struggles to do the simplest of tasks, like walking up
stairs.  Annie begins to lose all hope when she hears about a man in
Montana--a horse whisperer.  Tom Booker (Robert Redford) first
declines her offer, but being so determined, Annie picks up and leaves
her husband and work to meet with Tom, taking Grace and Pilgrim with.
While this may sound a little corny, it's played out seriously, and it
works beautifully.  Arriving in Montana, Annie pleads with Tom to take
a look at Pilgrim.  He accepts, only to find a horse with seriously
mental and emotional problems.  How can he figure this?  Not by
whispering, as the title may suggest, but by watching Pilgrim's every
move, and judging it as a sign of communication.  Horses have a unique
gift that only few animals have.  If you have ever touched or ridden a
horse, you know of the love and care that they give.  It's a special
thing when a horse bonds with its owner, and THE HORSE WHISPERER
flaunts the connection between animals and humans continuously.  If
you love animals, as I do, you are more likely to love this film than
not.  An animal's enduring trust can be something no human could ever
give.  Of course, the film's only flaw lies in the relationship that
ignites between Annie and Tom.  Tom has suffered a divorce from the
woman he loved, and he is unsure whether to try it again.  Annie is
married, but can't contain the love that soon grows for this man of
the country.  The only problem is that because of Tom's wariness, he
is hesitant to get involved with her, and the romance is left
smoldering instead of bursting into flames on screen.  But this really
only emphasizes the connection that is made between Grace and Tom, and
Tom and Pilgrim.
As aforementioned, the ending of the novel is changed in its
translation to the big screen, but the change made is for the best.
Instead of sinking into melodrama, it turns into a character-driven
drama that skillfully deals with many subjects at once.  The
screenplay, adapted by Richard LaGravenese and Eric Roth, contains a
lot of humor that lightens things up.  Most of the humor comes from
Booker's subtle personality and dry wit and MacLean's city-adapted
mannerisms.  Nearly all the humor pays off, and the audience will find
themselves laughing as much as crying.  But on top of the seemingly
heavy drama, Redford stands proud, holding everyone back from
venturing into gagging, sappy romance.  Redford's direction is some of
the best I have seen for a long time, and hopefully should earn him
another Oscar nomination.  If not, then something is wrong in the
state of California.  Keeping things slowly paced, we get to
experience the visual palette that he has provided for us, sort of the
way Kubrick did in 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY.  Many scenes are obligatory,
but we relish them, nonetheless.  And it's mostly all due to one
simple reason: cinematography.
I have one rule that I apply to all the films I see (one of my many
rules): if the plot, characters, acting, and direction is awful, but
the cinematography is excellent, I will give a positive review of the
film.  This is the one reason that I think David Fincher is the best
director working today.  Cinematography, for me, is the most important
aspect of any film because it's the one thing that distinguishes films
from plays or novels.  THE HORSE WHISPERER's camera work is exquisite,
capturing the luscious scenery like eye candy.  Filmed by Oscar-winner
Robert Richardson, the film contains some of the most gorgeous
cinematography ever captured on celluloid.  And he doesn't just limit
himself to the countryside.  Richardson knows how to film actors,
capturing small details that other people may think unnecessary.  I
can't emphasize this enough: if this film does not win (that's
right--win) the Best Cinematography Oscar, there is no justice in the
world.
Robert Redford has done an incredible job in presenting this
story--not just story-wise or technical-wise, but with top-notch
actors who flesh out the characters completely.  This is the first
time Redford has directed a film in which he has performed in, and he
has done something that Mel Gibson and Quentin Tarantino could never
do (the only other successful one that comes to mind is, of course,
Kenneth Branagh).  Redford succeeds as both an actor and director; he
almost forces us to like Booker, and yet we begin to connect with him
as he connects with the horse.  The astonishing sequences between
Redford and Pilgrim are the best in the film.  The dramatically
energized scenes contain more emotion than some movies in their
entirety.  Not to be outdone is Kristen Scott Thomas, the nominated
actress from the much-acclaimed THE ENGLISH PATIENT.  While her
performance in that film was vastly overrated, Thomas exerts the exact
amount of emotion and confusion that we expect from this character.
Her growth is slow and gradual, and almost mimics the horse as she
comes to term with her situation.  But more importantly is Scarlett
Johansson, the most complex character in the film.  At times, she
reminded me of Sarah Polley in THE SWEET HEREAFTER, and both compare
equally.  Johansson gives an Oscar-caliber performance that deserves
recognition.  This is one of the best performances you will likely see
this year, and she now joins the ranks of young actors that exceed
expectations (also on the list is Christina Ricci, Elijah Wood,
Natalie Portman, Anna Paquin, and a couple others).  Sam Neill remains
in the background for most of the film, but his scenes with Thomas are
exciting because Neill is not portrayed as the villain of the film, as
some would like to think.  He's a logical, smart human being, and his
final talk with Thomas is heartfelt and gratifying.  Supporting actors
Dianne Wiest and Chris Cooper are both very good in their roles, but
again, it's Johansson who steals the film.
THE HORSE WHISPERER is rated PG-13 for a disturbing accident scene and
some brief profanity.  THE HORSE WHISPERER flies along at two hours
and forty-eight minutes, and it almost seems too short.  I heard the
original cut was around four hours long, and I really wouldn't have
cared.  While the film does contain it's share of flaws, they are
quite insignificant to hurt it's power.  Some of the images are still
stuck in my head, days after seeing it.  The music by Thomas Newman is
simplistic but effective.  At the beginning, I could almost hear the
TITANIC theme in my mind.  But after a while, the music became
appropriate, underscoring every scene with a simple, country song.
This is likely to be one of the best films of the year, and being into
May already (with the summer season coming around the corner), you are
probably unlikely to see another one like this for a while.  Who
knows?  Maybe THE X-FILES will surprise us (as it should).

Author
James Sanford
As a novel, Nicholas Evans' "The Horse Whisperer" prompted snickers from a
lot of neigh-sayers who complained about the novel's melodramatic elements
and unconvincing characters. But it proved to be a surprise best seller
anyway, and all of Hollywood went after the film rights with a vengeance.
Thankfully, Robert Redford won out, and even better, he had the good sense
(horse sense, perhaps?) to hire Richard La Gravenese to do the screenplay.
La Gravenese was the man who managed to drain the sap out of "The Bridges of
Madison County" a few years ago and turn it into a classy, earthy romance.
He and fellow scribe Eric Roth perform similar good work here, turning what
could have been a tiresome round-up of stereotypes into a genuinely
involving story of two people struggling to bridge the gap between their
very different worlds.
For Tom Booker (Redford), life is simple and unadorned. He's a "horse
whisperer," a man who claims to "help horses with people problems" through a
variety of odd but effective therapies. New Yorkers Annie (Kristin Scott
Thomas) McLean and her teenage daughter Grace (Scarlett Johansson) are
sorely in need of his help. Not long ago, Grace and her horse Pilgrim were
almost killed in a horrible accident that took the lives of Grace's best
friend and her pony. The aftershocks of the tragedy still linger: Grace has
lost a leg, and Pilgrim is maimed and mad.
Desperate to shake her child out of what seems like an unceasing funk, Annie
leaves behind the glossy magazine she edits and loads up Grace and Pilgrim
for a cross-country journey to Montana to consult with Booker.
Of course, results do not come quickly or easily. And, of course, because
this is after all a movie starring Robert Redford, the city gal slowly comes
to understand and even to relish country ways.
Thematically, "The Horse Whisperer" has much in common with "The Electric
Horseman," Redford's popular 1979 vehicle that cast Jane Fonda as the career
woman who thaws out once she leaves her glitzy landscape behind. There's
even a direct allusion to the film in the name of the horse Booker gives to
Annie. But while "Electric Horseman" was a feel-good formula picture, "Horse
Whisperer" is aiming for something much deeper and truer.
Under Redford's beautifully understated direction, it finds its target.
Few directors are as attentive to performances as Redford, and the evidence
is all over this leisurely but never dull tale. Watch how Annie's hand
hurries to straighten out a tablecloth Grace has wrinkled or how Redford
inserts a shot of Annie cracking open a window in her sumptuous Manhattan
digs to breathe in the city air after a confrontation with Grace. These are
the kinds of moments that define characters - and they're exactly the sort
of thing generally snipped out of a film if it threatens to run over two
hours.
Redford allows "The Horse Whisperer" to go on for well over that, and, in
truth, trimming about 15 minutes out of the picture wouldn't have done much
harm. But what he's presented us with is an embarrassment of riches. He's
generously allowed Thomas to occupy the spotlight for most of the story, and
this magnificent actress more than rises to the challenge. She's smart
enough never to allow Annie to come off solely as either a cold, crabby
urbanite or a strident mom: There's always something else lurking just
beneath the surface. In one of the film's most telling scenes, Annie rushes
up to a corral and jumps up to stand on the fence, then slowly slinks back
from it when she realizes she's doing something her daughter no longer can.
There's no explanation, no apology, just a thoughtful little action.
Sam Neill, as her husband, takes what could have been a throwaway role and
makes it valid by never permitting his character to fall into the usual
blustery recriminations we've come to expect from such a third wheel.
Johansson has a difficult time keeping up with them, both literally and
figuratively, but she manages to get in touch with Grace's darkness and
self-pity.
And Redford's performance? What can be said? In a role of this type, he's
simply beyond criticism. It's difficult to imagine the film working nearly
as well without such a charismatic star. Or, for that matter, without such a
gifted director calling the shots.

Author
Tim Voon
Cast: Robert Redford, Kristin Scott Thomas, Sam Neill, Scarlett
Johansson, Dianne Wiest, Chris Cooper, Ty Hillman, Catherine Bosworth
Director: Robert Redford
Producers: Robert Redford, Patrick Markey
Screenplay: Richard LaGravenese, Eric Roth based on the novel by
Nicholas Evans
If you survived the 3 to 4 hour scenic footage of DANCES WITH WOLVES, or
the odd 2 to 3 hours of fly fishing in A RIVER RUNS THROUGH IT, then
theoretically, you should have no problems sitting through this 3 hour
version of horse taming and beautiful Montana countryside. This film,
will either bore you to tears from its opening moments, or have the
exact opposite effect, and draw you into an intriguing story that is
filled with passion and traumatised psyche.
After witnessing one of the most horrific horse accidents I have come
across in my small life span, I have vowed never to get on these great
four legged beasts, ever. This is a story of healing, not only for a
young girl, but also for her horse that sustained horrific wounds during
a most tragic accident. An initially, emotionally detached mother
(Kristin Scott Thomas), fights to bring her daughter out of a morbid
depression. She searches out a horse doctor (Robert Redford) in vain
hopes that healing the horse-gone-mad, will also bring inner healing to
her daughter. This is where THE HORSE WHISPERER comes into the picture,
with a mixture of patience, firmness and of course whispering, the
doctor lures the emotionally unbalanced beast back into sanity.
Robert Redford in jeans and cowboy hat, now rugged appearance is
everybody's version of a Marlborough man, except for the cigarettes. He
is filled this movie with what many people want on a sunny summer
holiday. A house by a stream, yummy country style cooking, the surrounds
of loving family, plenty of horse riding over lush plains, and of course
a love interest to share the experience with. Kristin Scott Thomas is
looking very much like Emma Thompson, with her hair cropped short and
trying to exude the emotions of a bitter, angry mother, who doesn't know
what she wants in life until she meets the Marlborough Man. Then the
ever-dependable Sam Neil is the overly understanding, sensitive husband
who knows when to give his wife room to choose.
Overall, a very good effort, and worth looking at if you ever wanted to
see a well made picture about horses, emotional healing and romance.

Author
Homer Yen
Redford Handles the Reigns as the "Horse Whisperer"
Hope, tragedy, and renewal are the tender elements that make up "The
Horse Whisperer", a thoughtful story that explores family, mature love,
and adult emotions.  Robert and Annie MacLean (Sam Neill and Kristin
Scott Thomas), though married, seem like a distant couple.  The father
lives on a sprawling ranch with daughter Grace.  Meanwhile, Annie lives
in the big city, is a frenzied editor of a major magazine, and has an
obsession with being in control.  A harrowing riding accident almost
kills young Grace (Scarlett Johansson) and her beloved horse Pilgrim.
Although they both survive, their emotional wounds are far worse than
the physical damage that they have suffered.  The horse becomes fearful
and jilted.  Meanwhile, Grace experiences profound indifference and
withdraws to the point where she believes that not only Pilgrim should
be put down to save him from the anguish that he is suffering but that
also she should be put down as well.  
Robert believes the doctors when they say that time heals all, but Annie
is not one to sit still.  She feels that every moment they waste, the
further Grace will regress.  Having researched many equestrian-related
journals, she reads about a man named Tom Booker (Robert Redford), a
Horse Whisperer who is a gifted sage that can help horses who have
suffered the same problems as Pilgrim.  Annie decides to seek him out
and makes the long journey to Montana with her now-contentious daughter
and Pilgrim in tow.  She hopes that if Mr. Booker can cure Pilgrim,
Annie will regain her spirit as well.  She also hopes that this
experience will bring the two of them closer together.
Redford agrees to help, but not unless Grace also gets involved.  Using
what seems like nothing more than patience and love, both Pilgrim and
Grace begin to respond.  Grace slowly comes out of her cocoon.  She
begins to accept her situation, allows herself to mourn her loss and
develops a closer tie to her estranged mom.  Meanwhile, another plot
begins to unfold as Tom and Annie slowly fall in love with one another.
His tenderness, good-looks, and the allure of the open skies and
picturesque landscape of the Montana frontier begins to break down
Annie's need for control and she finds herself feeling a renewed sense
of love.  Like Grace, Annie will have to ask herself to make some tough
choices about what she wants.
Considering the fact that Redford is in his 60s and Thomas is in her
40s, this is nothing short of a grown-up love story.  It is honest and
sincere in it's exploration of dysfunctional relationships and the
responsibilities and duties that come with family.  Spanning 160-minutes
in length, the film develops slowly as it pays respect to the kind of
relationships that can not develop in a short period of time.  Johannson
gives a worthy performance as the troubled youth trying to regain her
spirit and Thomas is cast well as the woman who tries to balance passion
with responsibility.  To sit through this without fidgeting, you'll need
the patience of a Horse Whisperer.  But Redford understands the charm of
the west, the importance of life, and the nuances of adult
relationships.

Author
Wallace Baine
To understand a horse, believes Tom Booker the title character in `The
Horse Whisperer,' you gotta know a thing or two about its past.
Same goes for directors. While director and star Robert Redford keeps
hearing comparisons to Clint Eastwood -- who also sought to redeem a
questionable piece of heartland fiction as director and star of `Bridges of
Madison County' -- the more appropriate jumping off point to assess this
nicely burnished cowboy romance would be Redford's own career as director.
Set in the same vast Big Sky landscape as his elegaic `A River Runs Through
It,' `The Horse Whisperer' is, oddly, reminiscent of Redford's first film
as director, 1980's `Ordinary People.' Both are concerned with the drama of
transcending family trauma, what we might today call `healing.' Only, in
this picture, the psychotherapy involves lariats.
Kristin Scott Thomas of `The English Patient' stars as Annie MacLean, a
rigidly ambitious magazine editor in New York City whose brittle emotional
distance could be a direct impersonation of Mary Tyler Moore in `Ordinary
People.' Annie's 13-year-old daughter Grace (a nicely poised Scarlett
Johansson) is involved in a horrific riding accident with her beloved horse
Pilgrim that kills a friend and causes Grace to lose a portion of her leg.
Pilgrim emerges from the accident deeply traumatized as well and though his
physical injuries eventually heal, his psychic ones lead the horse's doctor
to advise euthanasia.
Desperate to soothe the tormented horse's soul and to bring her daughter
out of the depths of self-pity, Annie looks up Tom Booker, a so-called
`horse whisperer' in Montana. Leaving behind her sweet-tempered but
ineffectual husband (Sam Neill), Annie drags a passive-aggressive Grace and
the demented horse across the country to convince a wary Booker to take a
look at Pilgrim.
What follows is the dude-ranch vacation of a lifetime for the two MacLean
women and a bracing break in the monotony of ranch life for Booker's
family, including his brother (Chris Cooper) and sister-in-law (a matronly
Dianne Wiest).
Longer than a Montana winter (actually, just short of three hours), `The
Horse Whisperer' moseys along establishing the gradual but striking
transformation of woman, girl and horse. Kristin Scott Thomas is especially
bewitching, morphing from pinched, bottled-up New Yorker to vibrant beauty
in blue jeans, her sharp features softening in the generous Montana light.
That old Western magic allows the relationship between mother and daughter,
heretofore charged with resentment and exasperation, to reach catharsis. It
does wonders for poor Pilgrim, whose post-traumatic stress syndrome begins
to ebb under Booker's quiet, firm guidance. And, predictably, it brings out
the sexual heat between the gentlemanly cowboy and the thin-lipped editor.
The love story is surprisingly chaste by today's standards (sorry, no
steamy sex). It's difficult to judge whether Annie is in love with Tom, a
divorced former Chicagoan with a yen for chamber music, or his image as
part of an intoxicating landscape of open spaces, campfires and simple
work.
What's more compelling is Booker's role in putting back together the
wounded relationship between Grace and her horse. The long lead-in
eventually comes to a powerful emotional payoff, particularly for anyone
who has experienced a bond with an animal.
It's too easy to dismiss `The Horse Whisperer' as soft-focus glop (though
admittedly, the camera keeps a respectful distance from the now craggy
Redford). This film finds a kind of awe for the majesty of horses, and in
the deep, spooked eyes of Pilgrim, you see a convincing glow of an animal
emerging from pain. The humans are OK, but that horse becomes the emotional
fulcrum of the whole movie. While Redford croaks out lines like `I didn't
choose to love you, Annie. I just do,' Pilgrim's eyes just whisper.

Author
Bill Chambers
THE HORSE WHISPERER ***1/2 (out of four)
-a review by Bill Chambers, wchamber@netcom.ca
(Now with TRIVIA; film, DVD, LD reviews; a section where YOU can
recommend movies;
fabric softener; and much more!
FILM FREAK CENTRAL
http://www.geocities.com/~billchambers
New address. New attitude. Same crappy writing.)
After Indecent Proposal and Up Close and Personal, Redford was wise to
direct himself in a picture at last. Redford
may look great on-screen, but over the past few years, he's proven
himself a bigger talent behind the camera.
Ordinary People is one of the best films of the nineteen-eighties, and
it was the first picture he helmed. While The
Milagro Beanfield War was only occasionally successful at combining
magic-realism with...um, realism, and I've
never been much of a fan of A River Runs Through It (to the chagrin of
many), Quiz Show was dazzling, energetic
and convincing. THE HORSE WHISPERER represents both his directorial
return to nature films and the first time
in that sub-genre Redford seems equally concerned with humans and
scenery.
Scott-Thomas plays Annie MacLean, an uptight but respected New York
magazine editor whose daughter Grace
(Johanssen) loses a leg and a good friend when an early morning ride
climaxes with their horses colliding with a
semi. Grace's horse survived, but barely, and has gone mad. Annie
refuses to put the animal out of his misery,
believing that if the horse heals it will mend Grace's newly-broken
spirit. Eventually, mother and daughter travel
alone to Montana to be with Tom Booker (Redford), a famed "horse
whisperer" who has a gift of calming horses
with simple looks and touches, leaving busy husband Neill behind.
Eventually, they move onto the Booker ranch
with the rest of Tom's family, and Annie finds herself falling in love
with all things Montana, including, naturally,
Tom, the wise and lonely trainer.
THE HORSE WHISPERER is delicately made. I dare say lyrical, since to
many people's ear, that word is
synonymous with boring. Hardly. THE HORSE WHISPERER has little to offer
in the way of surprise, but it does
have an honesty that is refreshing and consistently enjoyable to watch,
especially in the final third of the
story. Scott-Thomas and Johanssen seem like mother and daughter, and you
have no doubt believing that the
mountain vistas would put these New Yorkers under a spell, especially
since d.p. Robert Richardson's photography
casts Montana as Heaven on Earth. (A gimmicky but effective technique
the filmmakers employ is a switch in
aspect ratio from squarish to widescreen when the central location
shifts from New York to Montana.) The
underrated Sam Neill turns in perhaps his most heartfelt, emotive
performance as the nice-guy husband, who is as
authoritive and likeable as Tom. He is indeed a refreshing change from
the sexist, lout of a husband so many
writers resort to as a short-cut for explaining away the cheating
spouse's motivation. Unfortunately, one of THE
HORSE WHISPERER's only flaws is the chemistry between would-be lovers
Scott-Thomas and Redford. I liked
both of them, but I didn't necessarily believe that Redford would fall
for such a cold fish, even if the countryside air
thawed her slightly. Luckily (and curiously), this is such a rich and
textured movie that it doesn't quite matter-their adultery
seems like an afterthought, the obligatory sub-plot that ties many of
the characters' complex relationships together.

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: Robert Redford
Writers: Eric Roth and Richard LaGravenese (based on the novel by Nicholas
Evans)
Starring: Kristen Scott Thomas, Robert Redford, Scarlett Johansson, Sam
Neill, Diane Wiest, Chris Cooper, Cherry Jones, Catherine Bosworth
"The Horse Whisperer" is essentially a soap opera, but the best thing to do
with these kinds of stories is to either: a) run with that (as if it's
really a flaw); and b) run with whilst picking out some true depth in the
story, and maybe, if you're at it, say something about humanity.  This film
opts for the latter.
"The Horse Whisperer" deals with many subjects and themes, such as the
comparisons between man and animals, the subject of pain (physical and
psychological), and the concept of looking at things as ideas.  The fact
that it pulls all of these from a melodramatic storyline is something to be
applauded and revered.  The story revolves around the results of an
accident that takes place in the beginning where two young teenage girls,
Judith and Grace (Catherine Bosworth and Scarlett Johannsson,
respectively), end up screwing up while riding their respective horses, all
ending in a truck running over one of them and the other only just
surviving.  Judith is the one who dies, and Grace ends up loosing part of
her right leg.
Her horse, on the other hand, ends up just a little scarred, and very
crazy, so crazy that everyone is talking about killing it to end the pain. 
However, Grace's psychological trauma afterwards is so bad that it ends up
distancing her already dysfunctional family, consisting of lawyer dad
Robert (Sam Neill), and uptight magazine editor mom Annie (Kristen Scott
Thomas, glowing after her Oscar nomination last year).  Annie, fearing she
will lose her daughter completely, decides to hike out to Montana with her
(Robert has to work, of course) to a horse doctor...or "horse whisperer,"
as a magazine calls him...named Tom Booker (Robert Redford himself, marking
his first starring role in a movie he directed).
Although reluctant at first, Booker ends up helping the horse over a long
period of time, or so it seems.  What is horse whispering?  I'm not
entirely sure, but what I saw pretty much consisted of staring at the
horse, and making slow movements until the horse become comfortable with
you.  It so intrigued me that I decided to do this on my dog.  She attacked
me.  Guess you have to an aging Robert Redford to do it.
All the while, Booker begins to aide the two women psychologically.  He
helps Grace overcome her trauma, and causes her to relax and be able to
overcome the fact that she's missing a major body part.  Watching Redford
help her makes up some of the best scenes in the film, and when she finally
is able to smile and interact with people again, it's one of the film's
happiest moments.  Of course, he also helps Annie a bit as well, helping
her relax in the country (as opposed to the city), and to also rekindle her
romantic life once again.  Of course, these scenes lack the luster of the
scene with Grace, but they still work overall.
As the film goes on, it raises interesting questions about pain and
accidents, and how people tend to complicate their own lives with things
that they shouldn't really be worrying about but do anyway.  It does this
by showing a sorta "City Slickers"-esque clash about how city life makes
people worry more, while country life makes them relax and eventually enjoy
life, primarily because it's so simple.  It shows how people create
problems for themselves and often get to worked up about how they feel that
when they finally open up to others, it's a very therapeutic experience. 
It seems to be saying that there's always going to be pain over something;
it's just how you handle it.
Another very intriguing and intelligent concept it brings up, and one that
is so subtlely handled that it's easy to miss (I believe Roger Ebert clued
me into this one, thank you), is how we often get worked up by the idea of
something instead of the actual thing.  The film is an exercise in this
idea: it just seems to relish in the fact that it's taking place in the
beautiful state that is Montana, and often lingers in its gorgeousity. 
Photographed by Robert Richardson (a staple of Oliver Stone's), every shot
in Montana is a beautiful one that just NEEDS to be seen on the big screen,
just because it's almost like being there.
By the way it's shot and directed, it's easy to see how people can spend
their entire lives in the country.  The film never tells us about time or
how long they've been there (could have been weeks), and that was a smart
thing to do because you could probably lay down on the porch one day just
to look at the country, and when you've gotten up, you're 80.  You can
understand how Annie's character becomes so infatuated with living there,
and when Tom shows interest in her romantically, you probably are as duped
as she is: she's not really in love with him; she's in love with the idea
of him (as he is of her: his ex-wife was a city-person who didn't like the
country, so she's like a second chance for him).
As full of depth and beautiful as "The Horse Whisperer" is, the main thing
that makes it so great is its ability to just take what it is and run with
it.  The film is beautifully directed by Redford, who may not have deserved
an Oscar for his direction of "Ordinary People"...lemme correct that: he
DIDN'T deserve it (remember, Scorsese directed "Raging Bull" that year?),
but still shows himself as a wonderful director, one who sets up beautiful
shots, and has the ability to take his good old time telling the story (the
film runs around 160 minutes or so...plus previews), but still never bores
you.  And the fact that he lets the deep parts of the story stay as depth
and doesn't bring them to the surface is just how you make a good movie,
goddamit.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Nicholas Kleszczewski
More provocative than the racial lines drawn from the vastly different
responses of the O.J. Simpson verdict, are the gender lines drawn from that of
_The Horse Whisperer_.  This is a chick flick extraordinaire.  It's got women,
horses, extraordinary scenery, a sappy soundtrack, and Robert Redford.  Even
more importantly, (and significantly) it lacks a single identifiable relatable
male character.
Oh sure, there's Redford, but he's an icon, and unless you have a warped ego,
you can't touch him.  As strong an icon that Redford is, he is withered down
to saying "Do this" and by his quiet demeanor and strong presence, and you
_know_ it will get done.   Then there's Sam Neill, who's underused, and who
loses all credibility at the end.  Lastly, there's Chris Cooper, who I really
liked in _Lone Star_, who's reduced to saying "Yep" a lot.
For the women, you have Kristin Scott Thomas, in her first big role since _The
English Patient_.  Here she plays the Holly Hunter role: she's a workaholic
mother who needs to be in control over every situation, who learns to break
her city-bound roots and be taken in by nature (in more ways than one).  For
the girl, I forgot her name,  she's also drawn with the same character traits
of Natalie Portman, so much so that you'd swear that this girl had no
personality traits of her own.  She's smart, pouty, and "Hollywoodish average"
which is equivalent to saying she's an Ivory teenage girl.  And then there's
Chris Cooper's wife, played by a slightly more plump Dianne Weist, who infers
"Yep" a lot.
Why should I state the plot?  You see it in the characters.  Mystical cowboy,
overworked midlife crisis city-mother, pouty depressed but blooming adolescent
girl, the relatively good husband who wimps out, and the "Yep" family.  And
there's a horse, who's the best actor in the film.  Except for a very
well-executioned and haunting beginning, when the girl and her horse get into
an accident that involves snow, a steep hill, and a skidding truck, the film
then goes on auto-pilot for the rest of the time, which I wouldn't care so
much about, except that the film clocks at about three hours.
But what else can I say, that wouldn't get usurped by the throngs of women who
_will_ see this film?  Take my advice.  Since you will be taking your s.o. to
this, you can bargain your way so that she would have to watch two 90-minute
Jackie Chan flicks on video.
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/   Now offering spam-free web-based newsreading

Author
Matt Williams
In what may be (and probably should be) Robert Redford's last romantic
leading role, he has chosen to adapt Nicholas Evan's popular pulp
romantic novel Yet, while the Horse Whisperer is a beautiful film to
watch, its romance never gets aflame.
After a riding accident in upstate New York, young Grace MacLean
(Scarlett Johansson) is seriously injured, and her horse, Pilgrim, is
wounded and crazed.  Grace's mother, Annie (Kristin Scott Thomas)
believes the horse is the key to rehabilitating her despondent
daughter.  If Pilgrim can recover, perhaps her daughter can as well.
To this end, Annie seeks out the country's best horse doctor.  She
discovers an article about Tom Booker (Robert Redford), a horse
whisperer who applies patience and an intuitive understanding to horses
and their problems.  Even though an initial contact with Tom proves
fruitless, Annie resolves to haul Grace and Pilgrim halfway across the
country to Tom's Montana ranch.
There, with her bullheaded ways, she convinces Tom to help retame
Pilgrim.  Over the weeks which follow, she gets to know Tom and his
family (brother Frank (Chris Cooper), and sister-in-law Diane (Dianne
Wiest)), and grows to appreciate the Montana countryside.  But can Annie
remain faithful to her husband, Robert (Sam Neill), and her cluttered
New York lifestyle, or will the charms of Tom and Montana be too great
to bear?
In the end, it doesn't matter much.  As a romance, The Horse Whisperer
is terribly flawed.  The problem rests on Kristen Scott Thomas'
shoulders. She does such a good job at portraying how stubborn and
domineering Annie is, that her character comes off as mean and
cold...two traits that aren't conducive to passionate romance.
Luckily, there's more to The Horse Whisperer, otherwise the film would
be a complete waste.  The film's parallel rehabilitation story of
Pilgrim and Grace works very well (especially in contrast to the
romance).  Redford works much better as a paternal than a romantic
interest in this film. And Scarlet Johansson handles her difficult role
excellently.
Then, of course, the film is extremely well photographed, as can be
expected for an outdoor film in Montana.  But the cinematography doesn't
end purely with the scenery.  The film is shot in two differing aspect
ratios (a confining one for the New York sequences, and then glorious
widescreen for Montana.)  The animal photography is very good as well,
particularly over the opening and closing credits.
Although The Horse Whisperer might not be romantic, it is moving... and
a good looking film to boot.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Author
Michael Dequina
I'm not ashamed to admit that I'm a sucker for a good romantic weepie.
Pop 1996's The Bridges of Madison County into the VCR, and by the time a
rainsoaked Clint Eastwood casts a final heartbroken gaze at Meryl Streep,
in all likelihood you'll find me a blubbering mess (go ahead and laugh).
Not surprisingly, the long-delayed The Horse Whisperer is being positioned
as this year's Bridges: it also boasts a high-profile director-star (here,
Robert Redford), and it, too, is based on a bestselling love story by a
first-time author (Nicholas Evans in this case).  But only true suckers
will fall for this overlong, slow, and self-indulgent bore, which is not
only short on tears, but romance as well.
Never mind that it takes a hard-to-swallow plot contrivance to get the
ball rolling.  A violent horseriding accident severely injures 14-year-old
Grace McLean (Scarlett Johansson, in a role originally intended for Natalie
Portman) and kills her best friend Judith (Catherine Bosworth).  Also
shaken up in the accident is Grace's beloved horse Pilgrim.  Although
everyone says the best treatment for Pilgrim is a bullet, Grace's ballsy
magazine editor mother Annie (Kristin Scott Thomas) throws all caution and
good advice to the wind and takes Grace, who now wears a prosthesis where
her amputated right leg used to be, and Pilgrim on a road trip to Montana
to meet one Tom Booker (Redford).  Tom is a "horse whisperer," who
specializes in treating "horses with people problems"--a category under
which the once-gentle, now-irritable Pilgrim clearly falls.
It takes well over an hour before the inevitable "romance" between uptight
Annie and laidback Tom begins.  I place the term in quotes because what
develops only qualifies under the vaguest, most academic definition.  Tom
and Annie go horseback riding once, and suddenly they long for each
other--or rather, Annie longs for Tom, because Redford's stiff performance
offers no convincing insight into what Tom feels.  Redford had once vowed
to never direct himself in a film; based on his wooden work here, he should
have held to that promise.  Scott Thomas is a proven master at conveying
soul-aching longing (witness The English Patient) but she is at the mercy
of Redford (the actor and director) and scripters Eric Roth and Richard
LaGravanese (the latter of whom penned the terrific Bridges script).  I
couldn't feel for Annie since I couldn't understand why she would prefer
Tom over her straight-arrow but generally understanding husband Robert (Sam
Neill); her motivation is also sketchily developed, and as such the
forbidden "love" feels like a scripted development and not a natural one.
Not that Redford seems terribly concerned with the romance, which is
supposed to drive this story and serve as the emotional hook.  Redford
appears more content with crafting a valentine to the equine--and to his
own virility.  The Horse Whisperer is dominated by two images: horses
running wild and free and Tom, twirling his lasso in slow motion.  By the
time Tom is exerting his cool yet caring authority over other ranch animals
(in slow motion, of course), the point is abundantly clear--Tom is one
strapping cowpoke.  But Redford insists on drilling this point into the
audience's heads over and over and over again, at the clear expense of the
romance.  I'd say that three-fourths of the film's bloated
two-hour-and-forty-four minute running time is devoted to Tom and the
horses, with a fourth of that remaining fourth devoted to the supposed
"passion" between Tom and Annie:  They indulge in a couple of stolen kisses
(during a most incomprehensible doozy of an exchange--Annie: "I want to
know something."  Kiss.  Tom: "Are you sure?"  Kiss.  Annie: "I have to
go."  What the--?!); they share a romantic barroom dance; she cries--that's
it.  Oh, lest I forget Tom's oh-so-heartwrenching declaration of love,
delivered by Redford with all the expressiveness of a brick: "I didn't plan
on loving you.  But I do."  Really?  Could have fooled me...
The Horse Whisperer is not without its virtues.  Robert Richardson's
photography captures the Montana landscapes in all their breathtaking
majesty; Thomas Newman's score is lilting and evocative; Johansson is
terrific, creating the sole character that makes any connection with the
audience; and the opening accident scene has a disturbing intensity.  But
the scant good lies at the periphery of a deep, gaping void.  The
handsomely produced Horse Whisperer is not the flat-out cinematic
catastrophe that another recent actor-director effort, Kevin Costner's
notorious The Postman, was, but for swoony fans of movie love stories, this
uninteresting, uninvolving viewing chore might as well be.  There won't be
a damp eye in the house.
mj23@michaeljordanfan.com
michael_jordan@geocities.com  |  mrbrown@ucla.edu
>My personal WWW siteshttp://welcome.to/mrbrown
Michael Jordan Beyond the Court: http://fly.to/michaeljordan
A Michael Jordan Fan's Heartbreak: http://fly.to/mj23
Personal Page: http://welcome.to/w3md
>Other WWW sites I work onhttp://www.HollywoodHotline.com
Albany Online: http://www.AlbanyOnline.com
Eyepiece Network: http://www.eyepiece.com
"I didn't know what to expect. It's like something you chase
 for so long, but then you don't know how to react when you
 get it.  I still don't know how to react."
--Michael Jordan, on winning his first NBA championship in 1991
...or, my thoughts after meeting him on November 21, 1997

Author
Craig Roush
Release Date: May 15, 1998
Starring: Robert Redford, Kristin Scott Thomas, Sam Neill, Scarlett
Johansson, Dianne Wiest, Chris Cooper, Cherry Jones, Catherine Bosworth
Directed by: Robert Redford
Distributed by: Buena Vista Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (a disturbing accident scene) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/horse.htm
If there's anything THE HORSE WHISPERER says very well, it's what it has
to say about personality, and consequently, characterization. The three
or four main characters in the drama, and the ten or so more that are
significant supports, are very solid and very believable. And although
that should be a given in most movies, it is almost thankfully so in
this new Robert Redford film, a painstakingly thorough and mostly
powerful motion picture. It's been hailed as the best movie of 1998 thus
far, and although it may not warrant itself that award, it is definitely
among the top three movies yet. 
Redford directs himself for the first time in his thirty-six year career
as an actor, and the results are somewhat muddled. His skills as both a
director (ORDINARY PEOPLE) and an actor (OUT OF AFRICA) are excellent,
but he loses some of his touch when devoting his energies to both
positions on the set. Fortunately, the rest of his cast really picks him
up, and in the end makes him seem better than he really is. Kristin
Scott Thomas (THE ENGLISH PATIENT), Sam Neill (JURASSIC PARK), and
Scarlett Johansson (MANNY & LO) all enforce the movie's solidity and
concrete characterization. Believable as everyone is, though, the entire
cast seems to lack an extra edge or push that would grant them any
noteability. No one in the cast astounds or amazes (with the possible
exception of Johansson, whose portrayal of a crippled girl is akin to
Leonardo DiCaprio's portrayal of a mentally retarded boy in WHAT'S
EATING GILBERT GRAPE), and thus the intense character issues are
somewhat bland. 
The movie begins with Grace (Johansson) and her friend Judith (Catherine
Bosworth) out for a horse ride on a winter morning. Tragically, though,
their horses slip on icy ground, onto a road andinto the path of an
oncoming truck. The collision kills Judith and renders Grace minus her
right leg, which severly traumatizes the girl as well as her horse.
Annie (Scott Thomas), her mother, in her search for anything to help the
girl, chances upon the name of Tom Booker (Redford), a rancher with a
gift for helping horses. For lack of anything better, Annie leaves her
husband Robert (Neill) behind and takes Grace and the troubled steed out
to Montana to meet Tom and see if he can help them at all. It's from
here on, throughout the last three-quarters of the movie, that best part
of THE HORSE WHISPERER is clearly evident. The photography of Montana -
the impregnable mountains, the wide open skies, and the rolling hills -
is simply amazing. This movie may certainly garner an Academy Award
nomination in this respect. 
THE HORSE WHISPERER isn't for the uncomitted viewer. It runs almost
three hours in length, and doesn't include a continual excitement factor
in movies of similar length, such as Titanic or The Postman. Rather, it
relies on important character relationships and the inklings of intense
melodrama to keep an anticipatedly intelligent audience very interested.
This strategy works - most of the time - as those watching become bent
on learning just how Tom Booker will help the horse, or how Annie will
deal with her new position in life. Other than its lack of sheer
panache, there's nothing wrong with THE HORSE WHISPERER; this is quite
possibly the best three-star movie I've ever seen.
FINAL AWARD FOR "THE HORSE WHISPERER": 3.0 stars - a good movie.

Author
Marty Mapes
***1/2 (out of 4) I believe the book was called SPEAKER FOR THE DEAD. In it,
the protagonist was trying to help a mother calm an unruly child whose
father had died. After the usual shushing noises failed to help, the man
simply HELD the squirming child on his lap. When the kid saw he saw he was
trapped, he resorted to wetting his pants, then trying to squirm free. The
man held the child tighter, letting the sour liquid soak his own clothes,
continuing to reassure the child as though nothing had happened. Gradually
the child's squirming turned into hugging, holding tight to the man whose
patience, unconditional love, and permanent presence had won out. 
Patience, love, and persistence are the virtues Tom Booker (Robert Redford)
embodies in THE HORSE WHISPERER. Booker uses these virtues to gentle horses
who have been spooked. They seem to work just as well with people.... 
Grace (played very well by a young Scarlett Johansson) has been betrayed by
the world. 
She and her best friend, riding horses, are involved in a devastating
accident; a truck collides with them, killing her best friend and one of the
horses. Part of Grace's leg has to be amputated. Her horse Pilgrim is so
badly injured that he should be "put down," though her mother Annie (Kristin
Scott Thomas) is too distraught to be able to authorize the horse's euthanasia. 
Grace can't cope with having survived such a terrible accident. Her mother
is concerned but is no real help. Annie wants Grace to get better, but she
doesn't know how to go about it. She gives Grace too much distance for fear
of not giving her enough, and Grace is left to deal with her problems on her
own. 
Grace learns of her horse Pilgrim's condition and insists on seeing him. She
tries to approach him, but he is so spooked that he won't allow even Grace
to approach him. 
Annie contacts Booker, hoping he can come have a look at Pilgrim. In a
somewhat contrived device, Booker refuses an all-expense paid trip to New
York. Annie, in an attempt to compensate for her inability to help Grace,
decides to take time off from work and drive Pilgrim to Montana in the hopes
that Booker will not turn her away. It's the only thing she can think to do,
and she can't stand doing nothing. 
On the way, Grace and Annie fight. Their dialogue is extremely well written
(credit screenwriters Richard LaGravenese [BRIDGES OF MADISON COUNTY, THE
REF] and Eric Roth [FORREST GUMP]). Grace is genuinely angry at her mother
in a nondistinct, frustrated sort of way. Annie means well but it's as if
she's going through the motions of parenting. She's seems afraid to pry,
keeping too much distance from Grace every time they interact. Their fights
are selfish and frustrating and only mildly productive. Both characters are
so well developed (credit both actors) that neither reacts
two-dimensionally. You can see both sides of every argument, without ever
seeing the solution, which really makes you empathize with their situation. 
When they finally get to Montana, Booker's patience, persistence, wisdom,
and charm start working on Pilgrim, on Grace, and on Annie. With Pilgrim,
Booker administers physical therapy. When Pilgrim runs off one day, Booker
spends all afternoon waiting him out. With Grace, Booker gives
responsibility and trust, in exchange for Grace's commitment. With Annie,
Booker gives his attention and affection, not to mention a model for what
good parenting looks like. 
Probably the best thing about THE HORSE WHISPERER is the acting. Redford is
perfect as Tom Booker. His natural charm complements the folk wisdom and
quick wit of his character. Thomas and Johansson are a great pair of actors
who work very well together. Their mother-daughter conflict is as convincing
and natural as their growth and reconciliation. Alone, Thomas gets to show
her impressive range and Johansson proves to be a talented young actor. Even
Sam Neill, in a small role as Grace's father, gives a good performance as
the greenest of newcomers to Montana. 
Redford's direction is impeccable. Patience, love, and persistence help the
injured heal. Those same qualities describe the film itself. The pace is
gradual, but always progressing, keeping in stride with the progress of
Grace and Pilgrim. The accident scene is tightly shot and edited, giving the
whole sequence a severity appropriate to the damage it caused, and
appropriate in its contrast to the rest of the film. It is also likely that
Redford, as director, deserves some credit for coaxing such great
performances from the actors. 
The cinematography is gorgeous, albeit gratuitous. In what my friend Rob
calls "god's-eye view" shots, we see a tiny car and trailer moving through
the winding roads of Wyoming and Montana. The natural isolated location of a
Montana ranch backed by rugged mountains lends itself to beautiful pictures
and solid compositions (did the aspect ratio change when they arrived in
Montana or did my projectionist mess up?). On the other hand, these
great-looking shots don't always feel consistently used within the movie's
structure. They are wonderful to behold, but they are not always
incorporated into the prevailing mood of the storyline. 
And of course the story of healing is very good. Booker's way with people
and horses is at once mesmerizing and unbelievably simple. His story of
patience, love, and simple contact is a nice parable for our time.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     At one point in THE HORSE WHISPERER magazine editor Annie MacLean
(played by Kristin Scott Thomas) looks at a proposed cover and says
something like "The photo is perfect, the cropping is perfect, and the
layout is perfect.  It's dull.  Do it over."  Don't get me wrong.  THE
HORSE WHISPERER is a good film and not dull, but that quote comes
pretty close to pointing to the film's biggest weakness.  The story is
just a bit straightforward and obvious.  There are no surprises to
anyone who sees the trailer and makes all the obvious extrapolations.
Richard LaGravenese who wrote the screenplay for THE BRIDGES OF MADISON
COUNTY co-wrote the screenplay here also and it shows.  Robert Redford
co-produced and directed as well as taking the top-billed role of Tom
Booker.
     Annie MacLean is an editor on a high-profile magazine.  She has
what she thinks is a happy marriage to lawyer Robert MacLean (Sam
Neill) and a daughter, Grace (Scarlett Johansson) just 13.  And Grace
has a horse, Pilgrim.  One icy day Grace is riding with a friend and
their horses slip on a slippery hill.  In a nightmarish scene they role
and slide right into the path of an oncoming truck.  The friend and her
horse are killed outright.  Pilgrim is injured about as badly as a
horse can be without it being fatal.  Grace loses a leg. Distraught
over her daughter in the hospital, Annie refuses to that the
irreversible step of letting the veterinarian put down the suffering
Pilgrim.  Weeks later the result is a daughter and a horse, both of
whom have lost the will to live.  The maimed horse is wild and the
daughter just simpers and resents her mother's cool detachment.  Grace
retreats into the surrogate life of television watching.  The pressure
of bottling up her emotions makes Annie even more pushy and intolerant.
     Annie decides that what is needed is to have acknowledged horse
expert Tom Booker bring her daughter and Pilgrim back together.  When
Booker refuses to come to New York to look a the horse, over Grace's
and Robert's objection Annie buys a trailer and drives across country
to Montana with Grace and Pilgrim with the goal of getting Booker to
reunite Grace and Pilgrim.  It is a long siege and Annie gets to know
Booker's family and the people of the sparse Montana range.  Naturally
Redford's character is a real man with a natural no-nonsense view of
life that spreads oil on all troubled waters.  Tom is a man who always
knows the right thing to say and makes it look easy.  Annie had hoped
for a dual healing experience of curing Grace and Pilgrim, but she
herself changes as much as either of them and becomes a fuller person.
     In the wrong hands Nicholas Evans's novel could be a maudlin and
over-romantic opus, but Redford is, in fact, more talented as a
director than he is as an actor.  If anything the film is too polished.
THE HORSE WHISPERER may be a little heavy on the perfect landscape
shots.  This is as good a place as any to note that coming from
Touchstone/Disney the photography will probably also show to its best
advantage.  More than any other studio, Disney tries to release prints
on high-quality film stock.  A print may collect scratches after it is
out of Disney's hands, but there will be very few blotches flashed on
the screen because Disney Studios did not cut corners on quality.  The
score by Thomas Newman uses instruments appropriate to the Montana
setting.
     The casting is as polished as the photography with some very
respectable names.  Perhaps Redford himself may be getting a little old
to be playing romantic leads at 61 and his age is starting to show in
his face. Kristin Scott Thomas, best known for THE ENGLISH PATIENT, is
an attractive and intelligent actress. Sam Neill is another good actor
who in this film has too small a role.  Rounding out the cast are Diane
Wiest and Chris Cooper.  Overall this film does not do much that is not
predictable from the earliest parts of the film, but it tells its
romantic story well.  I rate it a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +2 on
the -4 to +4 scale.

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director: Robert Redford
Cast: Robert Redford, Kristin Scott Thomas, Sam Neill, Scarlett
Johansson, Dianne Wiest, Chris Cooper, Cherry Jones
Screenplay: Richard LaGravenese, Eric Roth
Producers: Patrick Markey, Robert Redford
Runtime: 168 min.
US Distribution: Buena Vista Pictures
Rated PG-13: brief violence
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
I grew up around horses, but I never paid any attention to them.  That
was for girls, I thought, though my mother and sister frequently tried
to get me to ride their horses.  I would watch them from my bedroom
window on occasion, and the only thing I could ever think about was how
intensely boring it seemed.  The horses certainly didn't look happy, and
the few times I did actually attempt to ride, the only thing I got from
it was a throbbing sensation in places where throbbing sensations are
not welcome.  
I was mildly interested in seeing The Horse Whisperer, but not because
of the horses.  I wanted to see it because of its stars, Robert Redford
and Kristin Scott Thomas.  It turns out, though, that I had developed a
sense of respect for horses through all those years of idly watching
them carry around the female members of my family.  I'm fairly certain
that Redford, who also directed, intended the audience members to
observe the horses in this film as characters.  I think he succeeded,
not only in this arena, but in many others -- The Horse Whisperer is a
visually stunning film, and often a moving human drama.  
The film opens with tragedy:  young Grace MacLean (Scarlett Johansson)
and her friend are riding their horses on the icy countryside outside of
New York; they stumble onto the road, where a truck barrels into them,
killing Grace's friend and seriously injuring Grace's horse, Pilgrim. 
We then meet Grace's mother, Annie (Kristin Scott Thomas) and father,
Robert (Sam Neill), a couple whom, we suspect, are married out of
convenience.  Grace recovers from the accident, but has her right leg
amputated; from then on, she's a somber and extremely depressed girl.
Although Pilgrim's injuries are severe, and the horse seems to have
undergone intense psychological torture, Annie refuses to let the horse
be put down.  She seeks out a man known to do miracles with horses; his
name is Tom Booker (Redford).  She takes Grace and the horse and drives
out to his ranch in Montana, at which point Tom begins working with
Pilgrim, even though the horse seems beyond help.
Perhaps the best thing about The Horse Whisperer is Redford's directing
and imagery.  Even without a story and characters, this film would have
been breathtaking to behold.  The opening credits roll simultaneously
with incredible footage of horses dashing about on what look to be sand
dunes; the colors are dark and full, the horses are silhouettes, and the
moment is beautiful.  Many scenes in the film have this quality -- there
are several shots of things that just look nice and have nothing to do
with the story directly, but add perfectly to the quiet and subtle tone
of the film.  It's a long picture, and Redford's direction is perfectly
paced:  the film never gets boring or loses the audience.
Almost equaling Redford's near-perfect visuals are the performances,
particularly from the two leading females.  Thomas is a beautiful,
commanding actress, and though this is only the second film I've had the
pleasure of seeing her in (the other being The English Patient), she
proves in just two roles that she has the rare capacity to hold an
entire film together by sheer force of talent.  Young Scarlett Johansson
is equally good; this is a fantastic performance, especially when
considering the actress' age.  Redford is also good, though he slightly
underplays his character in parts.  Sam Neill is, unfortunately, not
used to his full abilities (with the exception of one wonderful scene
towards the end in which he has a serious talk with his wife).  
I enjoyed The Horse Whisperer, but my main complaint lies in the
script, which feels sloppy at times.  There are a few scenes here --
like an important moment between mother and daughter -- that seem to
fall flat because of dialogue, or characterizations, or both.  Grace's
dialogue, for instance, is far too sharp for a girl her age; and, at
times, the dynamics between Tom and Annie are nebulous when they need to
be more clear.  The overall focus is also skewed between many things: 
Grace's struggle with Pilgrim, the mother/daughter relationship, and the
Tom/Annie relationship.  All of these are well-developed, but after
leaving the film, I wasn't sure what was supposed to be central.  I am
thankful that Redford steered clear of manipulation (though there are
scenes clearly intended to be tear-jerkers), but the ending seems an
unlikely solution to the situation.
All in all, I highly recommend the film, for I imagine most people will
enjoy it thoroughly.  There is a lot to admire here, from the truly
astonishing imagery to the first-class performances and cast.  It's a
moving film that works on many levels, and just barely escapes the
greatness it might have achieved with a few script changes and a more
objective editing job.  On a personal level, the film forced me to
notice horses in a way I never did while growing up with them, and I
think that many people might get the same feelings I did out of
Redford's insightful vision.

Author
Bob Bloom

  The Horse Whisperer (1998) 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Robert Redford,
Kristen Scott Thomas and Scarlett Johansson.
  All the action in The Horse Whisperer occurs within the first five
minutes of the film: A tragic accident while riding leaves one girl dead,
costs another her leg, and severely injures a prize horse.
 Unfortunately, the movie still has about two hours and 40 minutes to
unspool, and most of that is taken up with picture-postcard scenery, and
long stretches where nothing happens. Nothing, that is, except for a man
staring at a horse, and the maimed and scarred equine staring back.
 But this is no ordinary man. He's Tom Booker, the horse whisperer. He
doesn't help people with horse problems. As he says, he helps horses with
people problems. And this is no ordinary actor portraying this rugged
individualist. It's larger-than-life, face-as-craggy-as-a-Rocky Mountain
Robert Redford.
 The Horse Whisperer is a pretty movie. Redford who also produces and
directs the movie, based on Nicholas Evans' best-seller, must have incurred
a fuel bill running into the hundreds of thousands. Every five minutes it
seems a sequence segues into an airborne view, celebrating the vast
landscape, the great outdoors, the beauty of nature.
 OK, OK, Mr. Redford - environmentalist and conservationist - we get the
idea. Open ranges, crystal-clear water and unpolluted sky, good.
 Only after so many snowy peaks and rolling hills, it becomes tedious and
repetitious.
 Redford the director relies on Redford the superstar to carry the picture.
This is the first time Redford has directed himself and, unfortunately, he
just loves to watch himself do nothing. Of course, he looks sexy - even at
60 - standing in those worn jeans, cowboy hat perched atop his head, even
though he is beginning to show his age, especially in several of his many
close-ups
 The script, adopted by Oscar-winner Eric Roth (Forrest Gump) and Richard
LaGravenese (The Bridges of Madison County) is rife with homespun homilies.
Redford's Booker talks like a cowboy Master Po from the old Kung Fu TV
series rather than a real person. He is a saint, overly patient, infinitely
understanding, and something of a bore. But so are most people who are too
good to be true.
 Kristin Scott Thomas as Annie, the driven magazine editor who drags her
injured daughter and wounded horse to Booker's Montana ranch, is not a very
likable character. She is a bit snobbish, demanding, condescending and
thoughtless. Her transformation to all-American mom seems more plot device
than a natural evolution.
 Only Scarlett Johansson as Grace, the young girl trying to regain her life
and spirit, is believable. She is petulant, sarcastic and rude - an
ordinary teen-ager. But her gradual transformation seems more believable.
 The developing romance between Booker and Annie appears forced. No reason
is given for the supposed estrangement between Annie and her husband,
Robert (a wasted Sam Neill). What could attract this laid-back cowboy
philosopher to this self-absorbed woman is never made clear.
 Redford is usually a no-frills director. Like fellow actor Clint Eastwood,
his style eschews fancy camera angles and tricks. But for The Horse
Whisperer, Redford has become self-indulgent. He takes his time telling his
story. And it seems he has adopted the attitude that since he's Robert
Redford, Icon, his audience will simply follow and accept this because he
has something important to say.
 To paraphrase a legendary show biz adage: If you want to send a message,
call Western Union.
 The Horse Whisperer, like Redford's A River Runs Through It, is a
beautiful movie to watch, thanks to cinematographer Robert Richardson. But
what the movie needs is a film editor who can stand up to its
star-director-producer and convince him to trim about 45 minutes.
 Evans' original story, as well as Redford's pro-Earth campaign, are lost
in unending travelogue-like vistas of distant horizons, majestic mountain
peaks and dazzling sunsets.
  Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
Ind. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Author
David Sunga
Written by: Michael Tolkin and Bruce Joel Rubin, from the novel by
Nicholas Evans
Starring: Robert Redford, Kristin Scott Thomas, Scarlett Johansson, Sam
Neill
Ingredients: Traumatized girl and horse, magazine editor mother, animal
psychologist cowboy, lawyer dad
Synopsis: 
In big city Manhattan, a girl named Grace (Scarlett Johansson) has
teenage angst ("Who is ever going to want me now!?). Her mother Annie, a
magazine editor (Kristin Scott Thomas), is too tightly wound and bored
("The layout is too perfect. I'm bored. Do it over!"). Meanwhile Dad
Robert (Sam Neill) fears an unequal relationship with Mom ("I always
knew I loved you more than you loved me!"). When Grace and the horse get
into an accident, it sets up a situation where Mom, Grace, and the horse
must stay at the Montana ranch of the lonely horse specialist Tom Booker
(Robert Redford) and his extended family. Booker is a horse whisperer
(horse psychologist).
But the real star of this drama is the state of Montana, portrayed as an
idyllic, magical place of healing and family values. Will the horse, the
girl, the dad, and the mom get healed by their contact with nature?
Opinion:
Although the advertisements have tried to portray this film as the next
BRIDGES OF MADISON COUNTY (and a romance subplot does begin to develop
after the first hour and a half has passed), THE HORSE WHISPERER is
really mainly about healing under the beautiful auspices of the
storybook Montana countryside. 
Understandably, cinematography plays a huge role in THE HORSE WHISPERER,
and it is done well here. You'll see it all: bold skies and deep
sunsets, snowfall, aerial shots, lots of close ups of eyes (the window
to the soul), and even the meticulous laying down of Dad's silver
cufflinks, one by one. 
Characterization is also good. Even the horse does a good job. Each of
the characters is deep, with hidden secrets. 
As far as acting is concerned, Kristin Scott Thomas basically carries
the film; she's in nearly every single scene, and dialogue by other
characters is minimal, though the scenes are well acted. The chemistry
between Kristin Scott Thomas and Robert Redford is suspicious because
Annie MacLean is an uptight, hyperactive woman, while Redford as Tom
Booker is a mystical minimalist, but the plot explains that Booker
hasn't seen a woman for a while after his divorce.
One technique that doesn't work so well is something I call dialogue
after the fact. For example, the camera focuses seductively on lonely
Robert Redford hungrily reacting to the sight of Kristin Scott Thomas'
swinging legs during the first hour of THE HORSE WHISPERER, but in one
later scene he unexpectedly blurts out, "Don't you ever sit still?" Or
throughout the entire movie teenage Grace never looks in a mirror, never
wears make up, or eye-catching clothing, but she burst into tears and
cries to her mother that no boys will like her as a handicapped person.
Similarly, when the seemingly successful lawyer Dad visits Mom in
Montana, he makes the unexpected confession that he never thought he was
good enough for her. As the movie meanders about Montana, with mother
nature moving at her own gentle pace, the characters make sudden
confessions that seem to revise the history of earlier events. The idea
here, is that nature is a magical place that causes the repressed
insecurities of city folk to be drawn out and healed - - and that
contact with the horse whisperer, a natural man, acts as the catalyst to
liberation.
Although too much script emphasis is placed on the Mom character, and it
can also get a bit tedious watching nature all the time, there is enough
great cinematography, good acting, good characters, and healing in THE
HORSE WHISPERER to make this an enjoyable movie. 
